   #one equals two » Feed one equals two » Comments Feed one equals two
   WordPress.com

one equals two

Transform one meal into two with planned-overs

   Search ____________________ Search

Main menu

   Skip to primary content
   Skip to secondary content
     * HOME
     * FAQs
     * ABOUT ME
     * HANDY GUIDES
          + A bit on the side: SAUCES
          + A bit on the side: SALADS
          + A bit on the side: SALSAS
          + A bit on the side: VEGGIES
          + Eggstraordinary: EGG TIPS
          + In a nutshell: TOASTING NUTS and SEEDS
          + Knead to know: PASTRY and DOUGH
          + Liquid gold: HOME-MADE STOCK
          + Very ap-peeling tips: PEELING and DE-SEEDING
     * RECIPES
          + Complete recipe list
          + Recipes by category
     * PRESS
          + Featured on:
          + Awards:

Post navigation

   ← Older posts

One Equals Two has moved!

   Posted on June 3, 2017 by Saskia (1=2)

   You’ll find recipes, food news, cooking tips and more on the One Equals
   Two Facebook page, where I’m quite the busy bee!

   I’m still a mad keen food enthusiast but the time I could devote to
   this lil’ blog evaporated. It was always a labour-of-love, mostly
   worked on at 5.30am before my family awoke, and the occasional hour
   late at night!

   I’m super proud of this blog and all that I learned from it. It
   functions as my cyber cookbook; and I met (and now count as friends)
   some beautiful fellow foodies here in Australia and all over the world.

   Here’s a bit of what I’ve been up to online. One Equals Two opened up
   some cool opportunities, including helping to land me a fantastic job
   lecturing and running workshops in Digital Marketing. My background is
   in Graphic Design, so blogging and living and breathing Social Media
   made Digital Marketing a natural segue. I still adore Pinterest –
   25,000 followers and counting; and hey, I share LOTS of recipe finds
   there! I write for the Anorak magazine blog in the UK about vintage
   kid’s things (you’ve possibly ascertained from my use of vintage
   cookware and linens that I just loooooooove old stuff). You might like
   my post on vintage animal cakes (sneak preview below). I also blog for
   the National NEIS Association, sharing success stories from awesome
   Australian start-ups, including food businesses. I still design and
   illustrate too.

   I hope you’ll come and connect with me on One Equals Two Facebook – I’d
   love to see you there! Ciao for now, Sas. xxx

   -2
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in MY HOME, OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE | Tagged Saskia Ericson

You’re invited into my kitchen!

   Posted on July 20, 2016 by Saskia (1=2)
   10

   Wanna see my kitchen?! There’s a sneak peek below, but our entire house
   was recently featured on Apartment Therapy. Head on over and have a
   look – our place has *never* been so tidy (I even dusted)!
   Photos are by the super-talented Natalie Jeffcott – you can find her
   fab work here, and also on Stocksy.

   Saskia Ericson's kitchen Saskia and Tony's kitchen, Melbourne Saskia
   and Tony Ericson's house, Melbourne
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in MY HOME, OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE | Tagged kitchen design,
   Saskia Ericson, tiled splashback, vintage kitchen | 10 Replies

Recipes to relish (3 ways with pineapple, mango and lime chutney)

   Posted on May 9, 2016 by Saskia (1=2)
   7

   [Recipe 1] SUNSHINE CHUTNEY (pineapple, mango and lime) transforms into
   [Recipe 2] CHICKEN TOSTADAS with SUNSHINE CHUTNEY
   [Recipe 3] PULLED PORK TACOS with APPLE SLAW and SUNSHINE CHUTNEY
   [Recipe 4] MAPLE-GLAZED PORK FILLETS with SUNSHINE CHUTNEY
   We’re chutney chompers from way back, and the top shelf of the fridge
   is home to oodles of jars. Sunshine Chutney (pineapple, mango and lime)
   is our favourite. Make it and you’ll be dolloping it on just about
   everything, I promise. It makes a nice gift too – my boys teachers
   scored a jar for Christmas!
   Mango Season is over in Australia, but this chutney can be made with
   frozen mango cheeks, and there’s no greater way to ward off Seasonal
   sadness than a sweet, sticky spoonful of sunshine on your slow-cooked
   Winter meat. I’ve shared our three favourite ways to enjoy Sunshine
   Chutney below.
   TOSTADAS are crispy mini tortillas, topped with classic Mexican
   ingredients. We love tostadas el pollo, topped with avocado, leftover
   shredded roast chicken, a dollop of Sunshine chutney and scattered
   coriander. These are ace for a party, but you can be like Cher in
   Moonstruck and serve hors-d’oeuvres for dinner too!
   PULLED PORK TACOS – my version of the Mexican classic, tacos al pastor.
   I seriously think my 8 year old would happily live on these.
   MAPLE-GLAZED PORK FILLETS – if you haven’t cooked pork tenderloins
   before, go add them to your shopping list pronto! These are the perfect
   mid-week dinner. They take 20 minutes to roast and they’re SO juicy and
   lovely, especially with a hefty plop of Sunshine chutney 🙂

   Sunshine chutney (pineapple, mango and lime). One Equals Two. 3 ways
   with Sunshine Chutney (pineapple, mango, lime). One Equals Two. [Recipe
   1] Sunshine chutney

   Ingredients: (makes 1.5–1.8 kilos/3.3–4 lb chutney):
   1 tablespoon olive oil
   1 white onion, finely chopped
   2 small garlic cloves, finely chopped
   3 long red chillies, de-seeded, finely chopped (retain seeds for extra
   oomph, if liked)
   1 tablespoon yellow mustard seeds
   1½ tablespoons freshly-grated and chopped ginger
   6 large or 8 small just-ripe mangoes, peeled and chopped (approx. 5
   cups chopped mango)
   1 small ripe pineapple, peeled and chopped (approx. 3 cups chopped
   pineapple)
   1 large firm pear, peeled, cored and chopped into small cubes
   60 ml (¼ cup) lime juice (from 1–2 limes)
   2 teaspoons lime zest (from 1–2 limes)
   1½ cups verjuice (verjus)
   2 cups caster sugar (superfine sugar)
   ½ teaspoon sea salt

   Heat oil in a large saucepan over medium heat. Add onion, garlic,
   chilli and mustard seeds. Cook, stirring, for 3 minutes until just
   softened; taking care not to burn.
   Add all other ingredients and bring to the boil. Reduce heat to medium.
   Simmer for 1– 1¼ hours uncovered; or until thick and jammy. Stir
   occasionally, and keep a close eye on the chutney towards the end of
   the cooking process, to ensure it doesn’t stick and burn. It should
   look like a thick, sticky orange puree with softened pineapple chunks,
   and it will firm up further on standing.
   Divide the chutney among hot, sterilised jars. Store chutney in a cool,
   dark place.
     * Use good quality fruit that is not over-ripe. Fully ripened fruit
       contains less pectin, the substance that makes jams and chutneys
       set. It’s best to use your fruit as soon as possible after buying.
     * Frozen mango cheeks can be used in place of fresh mango if out of
       Season.
     * Double the ingredients for a bulk quantity (12 cups) to share with
       friends. Cooking time will be slightly longer, around 1½–1¾ hours.
     * I always add a pear or two to my chutneys and jams as they’re high
       in pectin which helps achieve a good set even if your hero fruit is
       beginning to over-ripen. Lime also contains a high amount of
       pectin.
     * Verjuice is available at large supermarkets and specialty food
       stores. In Australia, Maggie Beer’s verjuice is the best quality
       and flavour (IMHO)! Replace the verjuice with apple cider vinegar
       if unavailable (I’ve tested this recipe with both).
     * Resist the desperate urge to enjoy your chutney immediately! Allow
       it to further firm up for at least 24 hours, preferably longer,
       before using.
     * Chutney in properly sterilised jars will keep in a cool, dark place
       for up to ten months. Refrigerate after opening.

   Chicken tostadas with sunshine chutney. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 2] Chicken tostadas with Sunshine chutney

   Ingredients (makes 25):
   25 x 9cm tostaditas (deep fried tortillas)
   1 large avocado, sliced
   2 cups cooked chicken, shredded (from ½ a roast chicken)
   ♦ ½–1 cup sunshine chutney (see Recipe 1, above)
   1 red (purple/Spanish) onion, thinly sliced
   Fresh coriander (cilantro), chopped

   Arrange tostaditas on a large serving platter, or little individual
   plates (pictured).
   Place 2 slices of avocado on each, top with 1 tablespoon
   shredded chicken, a couple of thin slices of onion and ½ tablespoon
   sunshine chutney. Scatter with fresh coriander and serve at once.
     * Deep-fried tostaditas are available in-store and online from from
       El Cielo. If unavailable, make your own by placing mini corn
       tortillas on a tray lined with baking paper. Brush both sides
       lightly with olive oil and bake in a hot oven until crisp, 12–15
       minutes. Alternatively, mini corn tortillas can be fried in hot,
       shallow oil, about 2–3 minutes each side until golden brown. Drain
       on kitchen paper.

   Pulled pork tacos with sunshine chutney. One Equals Two

   [Recipe 3] Pulled pork tacos with Sunshine chutney

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   1 tablespoon olive oil
   12 x 14cm soft white corn tacos (tortillas)
   2½–3 cups pulled pork (recipe here), warmed
   Apple slaw (recipe here)
   ♦ 1 cup sunshine chutney (see Recipe 1, above)
   Fresh coriander (cilantro), chopped, to serve

   Lightly oil a non-stick frying pan. Pan-fry the tortillas in batches,
   for ten seconds each side, until softened. Wrap in a clean tea towel to
   keep warm, as you prepare the remaining tortillas.
   To serve, spoon reserved pulled pork down the centre of each tortilla.
   Top with apple slaw and a good dollop of sunshine chutney.
   Scatter with fresh coriander and serve at once.
     * Pulled pork can be warmed carefully in a small covered saucepan, or
       in the microwave (drizzle with the reserved cooking juices, cover
       with cling film, and microwave on high for 1–2 minutes). Don’t make
       it too hot!

   Maple-glazed pork fillets with sunshine chutney. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 4] Maple-glazed pork fillets with Sunshine chutney

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   2 free range pork fillets (tenderloins), 250-300g each
   1 tablespoon olive oil
   ♦ ½–1 cup sunshine chutney (see Recipe 1, above)
   Glaze ingredients:
   3 tablespoons pure maple syrup
   2 heaped teaspoons smoked paprika
   ¼ teaspoon dried chilli powder (or more, as liked)
   ½ teaspoon salt

   Preheat oven to 200°C (390ºF).
   Mix glaze ingredients together in a small bowl, and brush over the pork
   fillets with the back of a soup spoon.
   Heat oil in a large non-stick frying pan. Add pork and sear on all
   sides until nicely browned, 4–5 minutes total.
   Transfer pork to a tray lined with baking paper, and drizzle with any
   remaining glaze.
   Bake in pre-heated oven for 15–20 minutes, until pork is cooked
   through. Remove from oven. Transfer pork to a board, cover lightly with
   foil and allow to rest for 5 minutes.
   To serve, cut the pork into thick 1cm (½”) medallions. Arrange on
   plates and drizzle with any juices left on the tray. Serve with a
   dollop of sunshine chutney.
     * Pork fillet is also known as pork tenderloin, and is the eye fillet
       that comes from within the loin. It’s super tasty and lean; and is
       best cooked quickly in a hot oven as it can dry out if overcooked.
       Don’t make the mistake of buying pork loin, which is quite a
       different cut to a tenderloin and requires a longer cooking time.
       Read here for more information.
     * Leftover cooked pork fillet can be refrigerated for up to 3 days.
       Thinly sliced leftover cooked pork fillet is THE BEST in
       sandwiches! Serve with Sunshine chutney and cos (Romaine) lettuce.

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHICKEN & DUCK, GLUTEN FREE, MEXICAN & SPANISH, PARTY FOOD,
   PORK | Tagged Chicken tostadas, mango chutney, pineapple chutney, pork
   tacos, Teacher gifts, tostadas de pollo | 7 Replies

Taking stock [number 2]

   Posted on March 22, 2016 by Saskia (1=2)
   18

   Howdy! Here’s a wee glimpse at what I’ve been cooking, making,
   coveting, looking at and thinking about lately. Have really missed
   blogging and connecting with my cyber penfriends; but haven’t found any
   free time in yonks (mainly ’cause I no longer wake at 5.30am, and
   work/life have been super busy this year); so there are some Christmasy
   things listed below too!
   The originator of the stock-taking concept is Pip at Meet me at Mikes,
   and she kindly provides a blank list at the bottom of her #takingstock
   posts for you to copy, if you feel inspired to join in. What’ve you all
   been up to? xx

   YULE LOG by One Equals Two Edible pine cones Galahs at Wilson
   Promontary Tidal River swim Tsukune (teriyaki chicken balls) rice bowl.
   One Equals Two. Mushroom tea towel Peacamole dip (guacamole made with
   peas) COOKING: my first ever Yule Log, using Nigella’s recipe.
   MAKING: edible pine cones! Found the idea at Handmade Charlotte. We
   don’t have the stipulated Chex cereal in Aus, but Milo Cereal worked a
   treat and looks exactly like ‘real’ pine cone pieces I reckon!
   DRINKING: gin and tonic. Have rediscovered it after years and years.
   READING: Purity. Finally! Loved it.
   WANTING: to thank my mum publicly. She’s our Fairy Godmother,
   occasionally letting herself into our house while we’re at work; to
   tackle a stack of dishes. Thanks ma! You should leave a scattering of
   fairy glitter as your calling card.
   LOOKING: at holiday snaps. Can’t believe our dream vacation was a year
   ago.
   PLAYING: UNO.
   DECIDING: to break out my renovator soon. Husband gave me one for my
   birthday after I’d expressed interest in trying log carving. Last night
   I was given a log!
   WISHING: Summer hadn’t ended.
   ENJOYING: rice bowls for dinner. Our fave is Tsukune (teriyaki chicken
   balls), pulled from the freezer and nuked, sticky sushi rice with
   quinoa (recipe from my guest post on Simple Provisions), kimchi from
   The Fermentary, sugar snaps, asparagus, avo, carrot, cuke, pickled
   ginger, black sesame seeds and a beer!
   WAITING: to see Pee Wee’s new movie.
   LIKING: Instagram. Joined last year, utterly addicted!
   WONDERING: if I’ll ever get around to sorting 10 years (seriously!) of
   digital photos into albums.
   LOVING: the sculpture walk on Herring Island in the Yarra River,
   accessible by punt. Utterly surreal, bush-walking so close to the city!
   CONSIDERING: a holiday in Sydney.
   WATCHING: our own Dean Jones mini-festival for our semi-regular Family
   Movie Night: That darn cat (family fave), Blackbeard’s Ghost and the
   first three Herbies. All highly recommended!
   HOPING: to have another burger at Changz. They make all their own
   sauces too!
   MARVELING: at my friend Chris’s amazing cakes! Check out Miffy ♥
   NEEDING: a hair cut.
   SMELLING: a bit woofy, after walking to work. 2.8km! Planning to do it
   once a week.
   WEARING: my mum’s 60s ski jacket with fab sun pattern.
   FOLLOWING: landscape/architecture/suburban life photographers on IG –
   Shit Gardens, Sad Topographies, Sublurb, Ben Blacket and Hayley
   Eichenbaum.
   NOTICING: my boys growing up; and feeling happy, sad, incredulous and
   proud. They’re both lovely 🙂
   THINKING: about my friend J, who has moved to Dubai after finding a
   creative dream job. Miss you heaps petal.
   FEELING: well rested after our camping trip to Wilson’s Prom. Swam in
   Tidal River every day – it’s like a massive cup of tepid Earl Grey,
   brown-hued from the marinating leaves.
   ADMIRING: Our local galahs (pink-chested Aussie cockatoos); and also
   Melbourne creatives like Anna, Sandra, Pilgrim, Alice, Esther and
   Neryl. Lady artists rule!
   SORTING: my vintage tea towels (this mushroom beauty is one of my
   faves).
   BUYING: more vintage illustrated cookbooks. Hellllllp! Can’t stop!
   GETTING: hungry.
   BOOKMARKING: Anonymous works.
   DISLIKING: our Government’s inhumane policies on Asylum Seekers and
   Refugees.
   OPENING: another issue of Epicurean. Scored a stack of these incredible
   60s/70s Australian food/wine mags from a friend’s mum. Art Directed by
   one of my design heroes, Les Mason. Will share some pics soon.
   GIGGLING: at the Katering Show (new episodes coming in April, 2016)!
   SNACKING: on Peacamole – guacamole with peas in place of avocado.
   Recipe by Clotilde at Zucchini & Chocolate, one of the first food blogs
   I ever followed. PS. There’s an avocado shortage in Australia, blamed
   on rain, bushfires and conspiracy.
   COVETING: one of Kirsten Perry’s hand-made rings.
   HELPING: my 8 year old make (and eat) choc chip cookies.
   HEARING: the Undertones right now (this track, one of my fave 80s
   tunes); and warbling magpies in our backyard (classic Aussie sound).
   PS. Did you know a group of magpies is called a Mischief?
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CRAFT, OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE | Tagged #takingstock | 18
   Replies

2015 Christmas giveaway. Awesome food-related prize pack! (closed)

   Posted on November 26, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   16

   One Equals Two is Four! Every year on my blogiversary I host
   a Christmas Giveaway. This year’s prize pack is the bee’s knees,
   with one lucky winner scoring 9 fabulous food-related things (7 from
   Melbourne designers)! The competition is open to everyone, anywhere in
   the world, so get cracking! Official rules below the photo.
   Here’s how to enter:
   • Head over to the Facebook competition link.
   • Submit your email address in the field provided (I don’t store or use
   email addresses, they’re just for contacting the winner). The winner
   will be randomly selected via woobox.
   Entries close 7th December 2015 at 10.30pm (AEST). The winner will be
   contacted, and announced right here on the blog and on Facebook, on 8th
   December.
   Here’s the list of loot:
   1. Large enamel ice cream keyring in gift box by Bride & Wolfe,
   Melbourne. Fab keyring made from vitreous enamel, oven blasted and
   stone polished. The steel split-ring features Bride & Wolfe’s signature
   round charm. 12 x 4.5cm (4.7 x 1.8″).
   2. ‘Notebook’ throw by Arro Home (Beci Orpin’s homeware range),
   Melbourne. 100% linen big, bold throw for the bedroom, lounge room or
   dining room – imagine it on the table for Christmas lunch! 130 x 180cm
   (51 x 70″).
   3. ‘Travel Tips’ nougat nail polish by Obus, Melbourne. Vegan,
   high-shine, chip resistant formula containing only non-toxic
   ingredients. In mouth-watering creamy nougat shade. Made in Australia.
   4. Pass It Down and Keep Baking! by Beth Ellen Wilkinson, Melbourne.
   Independently produced, beautifully designed cookbook featuring over 40
   family recipes. The venture of sisters Laura Jean and Beth Ellen. See
   it here.
   5. ‘Daisy’ apron by Arro Home (Beci Orpin’s homeware range),
   Melbourne. Very cute half-length retro-inspired polkadot apron! 100%
   cotton.
   6. Tea towel by Wirely Home, Melbourne. Wirely collab with artist and
   costume designer Shio Otani. Designed and printed in Australia, made
   from a highly absorbent linen-cotton blend.
   7. ‘Mouk in New York’ kids pouch by Marc Boutavant for Petit
   Jour, Paris. Featuring Mouk and his pals on the front, and a fab cookie
   and cake pattern on the back. Oilcloth with zip closure, 26 x 13cm (10
   x 5″).
   8. Hand-made vintage Christmas gift tags x 6 made by me from deceased
   Little Golden Books. Backed with kraft paper, with butchers twine for
   fastening.
   9. Sweet Treats Kit by Meri Meri, London. Accessorize your home-made
   jams and cookies! This kit includes 18 decorative tags in 3 designs and
   twine to tie everything together.
   Update 8/12/15: Huge congrats to Cecilia Warrick, the randomly-chosen
   winner!

   PS. This is not a sponsored post. I selected and paid for everything
   all by myself.
   Please see official rules below photo.

   2015 Christmas Giveaway. Everyone welcome! Via One Equals Two.
   One Equals Two 2015 Christmas giveaway. Official rules.
   Participation in this promotion is subject to the following terms and
   conditions.
   One lucky winner will win the 9 items described and pictured above. The
   competition is open to everyone, worldwide. Shipping/delivery costs
   will be covered by One Equals Two.
   Only one direct email entry, via the official entry form, per person is
   permitted. Each entrant may also be awarded 1 bonus entry if the
   competition is shared on the entrant’s Facebook timeline and a user
   clicks and enters from the entrant’s shared link.
   The Competition starts on 26/11/2015 and ends on 7/12/2015 (10.30pm
   AEST).
   This is a game of chance, and the winner will be randomly drawn via
   woobox on 8/12/2015. The winner’s name will be announced on the One
   Equals Two Facebook page and the One Equals Two website (right here).
   To take part: please visit the official entry form link, and submit
   your email address via the field provided. Email addresses are required
   to contact the winner only and will not be stored or sold. One Equals
   Two will notify the winner using the email address provided. It is up
   to entrants to ensure the email address provided is accurate and valid!
   If the potential winner cannot be contacted or fails to respond to the
   winner notification within 7 days (by 15/12/15 at 9:00am AEST), One
   Equals Two reserves the right to then randomly choose a new winner.
   You must be a member of facebook.com in order to enter this
   competition; however this promotion is in no way sponsored, endorsed or
   administered by, or associated with, Facebook. You are providing your
   information to One Equals Two and not to Facebook. By participating in
   this promotion you agree to a complete release of Facebook from any
   claims.
   Prizes are awarded ‘as is’ with no warranty or guarantee. One Equals
   Two is not liable for any damages or loss that may occur during
   shipping.
   Good luck!
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHRISTMAS | Tagged christmas competition 2015, christmas
   competitions, Christmas giveaway, competitions australia | 16 Replies

Mexcellent! [3 ways with home-made cooked tomato salsa]

   Posted on November 8, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   20

   [Recipe 1] HOME-MADE CHUNKY COOKED TOMATO and RED PEPPER SALSA
   transforms into
   [Recipe 2] SOUTHWESTERN BLACK BEAN and CHICKEN SALSA SOUP
   [Recipe 3] MEXI BURGERS
   [Recipe 4] NACHOS
   So, I’ve become a serious Insta addict since signing up in April.
   Nobody warned me how dangerous it was – there are vintage SHOPS on
   there!!! For a [DEL: hoarder :DEL] collector like me, that has meant a
   conga line of parcels arriving in the mail. My modest set of 3 vintage
   Japanese ceramic veggie dishes, found in local oppies (thrift stores),
   has blossomed to become a collection, thanks to @precious_junk,
   @touchwood_kollektiv and @teenagevintageboy.
   My favourite is the green pepper, shown off below as a receptacle for
   home-made chunky cooked tomato and red pepper salsa. May I just say
   that this salsa is a knockout! My secret ingredient is biber salçasi
   (Turkish red pepper paste), available from Middle Eastern stores. It’s
   thick and rich, similar in consistency to tomato paste, made from
   sun-dried red peppers.
   Below are three totally mexcellent ways to use the home-made salsa.
   Southwestern black bean and chicken salsa soup takes literally minutes
   to prepare as the ingredients are simply dumped into a saucepan and
   simmered. It’s perfect for a quick mid-week dinner or weekend lunch. We
   first sampled this soup on our US trip early this year. My recipe is
   loosely adapted from this one by Betty Crocker.
   Mexi burgers are a recent revelation, inspired by a visit to our local
   burger joint, Grill’d. I cheekily asked our waitress what their secret
   burger spice was, and she shared that their burgers contain 30% tomato
   relish mixed in with the beef! This allows them to use low-fat mince,
   with the relish adding juiciness. I copied their idea, using salsa
   instead, and Phwoar!
   And lastly, Nachos! Seriously, is there a better afternoon schnack?

   Vintage ceramic veggie dish collection. Made in Japan. Home-made cooked
   tomato salsa and 3 ways to use it. One Equals Two. Chunky cooked tomato
   and red pepper salsa. One Equals Two. [Recipe 1] Chunky cooked tomato
   and red pepper salsa

   Ingredients (makes approx. 1½ kilos/3 lb; or 5 x 300g/10 oz jars)
   2 tablespoons olive oil
   2 medium red (purple/Spanish) onions, finely diced
   4 large garlic cloves, finely chopped
   2 kilos (4.4 lb) very ripe tomatoes, peeled, de-seeded, chopped (about
   5 cups)
   1 small red capsicum (red pepper), or ½ large, de-seeded, finely diced
   2 large red cayenne chillis, de-seeded, finely chopped; 1 teaspoon
   seeds retained
   2 tablespoons brown sugar
   ¼ teaspoon ground cloves
   ⅓ cup apple cider vinegar
   4 tablespoons mild biber salçasi (Turkish red pepper paste)
   ½ teaspoon salt
   ⅓ cup lime juice (from 2–3 limes)
   ⅓ cup finely chopped fresh coriander (cilantro)

   Heat oil in a large heavy-based saucepan over low-medium heat. Cook the
   onion for 4 minutes. Add the garlic and cook for 2 minutes.
   Add all other ingredients except coriander and simmer gently,
   uncovered, for 40-55 minutes (cooking time will depend upon the
   juiciness of your tomatoes), stirring occasionally, until thick with a
   little liquid remaining. Stir through coriander.
   Scoop into hot sterilised jars and store for up to 6 months in a cool
   dark place, or freeze for up to 3 months in plastic containers.
   Allow salsa to cool completely before using.
   ♦ You’ll need 2 heaped cups (about 600g/20 oz) for Recipe 2 (soup), 1
   heaped cup (about 300g/10 oz) for Recipe 3 (burgers) and 1 heaped cup
   (about 300g/10 oz) for Recipe 4 (nachos).
     * Biber salcasi is available from Middle Eastern stores such as A1
       and my fave Melbourne food emporium Oasis; as well as online from
       Amazon and Sous Chef (UK). You’ll find plenty of other uses for it
       – spread it on pizza bases and use it in place of tomato paste in
       baked eggs, Amatriciana pasta sauce or Lamb and lentil tagine. It
       can be frozen in 1-tablespoon lumps wrapped in cling film, for up
       to 3 months. If unavailable, replace with tomato paste (tomato
       concentrate) – I’ve tested my salsa recipe with both! Biber salcasi
       gives a richer more complex result, and tomato paste lends a more
       traditional flavour.
     * I find 1 teaspoon chilli seeds are enough for a little kick,
       especially for the kids, but feel free to include all the seeds for
       a more fiery salsa.
     * This salsa is amazing spooned over scrambled eggs or baked fish;
       dolloped on tacos, chilli con carne or baked jacket potatoes; and
       in the following 3 recipes…

   Southwestern black bean and chicken salsa soup. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 2] Southwestern black bean and chicken salsa soup

   Ingredients (serves 4-6):
   ♦ 2 heaped cups (about 600g/20 oz) reserved salsa (see recipe 1)
   1½ teaspoons cumin
   4 cups chicken stock, store-bought or home-made
   1 x 400g (15 oz) can black beans, drained, rinsed
   2 cups leftover chopped cooked chicken (from ½ a roast chicken)
   1 cup uncooked corn kernels (cut from 1 large corn cob)
   Salt
   Fresh chopped coriander (cilantro)

   Place all ingredients, except coriander, in a large saucepan. Bring to
   a boil, reduce heat, and simmer for 10–15 minutes, covered, stirring
   occasionally.
   Season to taste (if you’ve used store-bought stock you may not need
   salt).
   Ladle soup into deep bowls and scatter with coriander.
   Inspired by this Betty Crocker recipe.
     * Leftover soup can be refrigerated for up to 3 days, or frozen for 3
       months.
     * You can use cooked dried beans for this recipe. 1 can black beans,
       drained, yields about 1½ cups of beans. For 1½ cups of beans, soak
       125g (4.5 oz) dried black beans overnight. Drain, place into a
       saucepan and cover with water. Bring to the boil. Simmer for 40–50
       minutes, or until tender. Drain and rinse.
     * You can of course use store-bought Mexican salsa for this recipe if
       you’re pushed for time! You’ll need 2 x 300g (10 oz) jars.

   Mexi Burgers with home-made salsa. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 3] Mexi burgers

   Ingredients (makes 8 burger patties, 4 to be frozen for later):
   1½ kilos (3 lb) minced (ground) beef
   1 teaspoon salt
   ⅓ cup dry breadcrumbs
   ♦ 1 heaped cup (300g/10 oz) reserved salsa (see recipe 1)
   1 large egg, lightly whisked with a fork
   Olive oil, for cooking
   To serve:
   4 brioche buns (or other hamburger buns, as preferred)
   Cos (romaine) lettuce leaves
   ♦ Reserved salsa, extra (see recipe 1)
   Pickled jalapeños
   Thinly sliced red (purple/Spanish) onion
   Sliced tomato

   Mix and squeeze the beef, salt and breadcrumbs together well with your
   hands. Add the salsa and egg and bring together until well combined.
   Form into 8 patties (refrigerate or freeze 4 for another time).
   Brush a BBQ or ridged grill plate with olive oil. Grill the patties for
   about 4 minutes each side, until just cooked through.
   Meanwhile, split your hamburger buns. You can toast them if you like.
   To assemble place a lettuce leaf on each bun, followed by a patty, a
   good dollop of extra salsa, a few pickled jalapeño slices, onion, one
   or two lettuce leaves and sliced tomato. Pop the lids on and tuck in!
     * We like our burgers BIG! Use the mixture for 12 smaller patties if
       you prefer!
     * Uncooked patties can be frozen in a plastic container, with baking
       paper squares between each, for up to 3 months. Defrost in the
       fridge overnight, and drain on kitchen paper before cooking.
     * Pickled jalapeños are available at large supermarkets. Replace with
       sliced pickles or whole cornichons if unavailable.
     * Customise the burgers as you like! Add beetroot, mayo, sliced
       avocado and/or Swiss cheese (after grilling one side, turn patties
       over and place a slice of cheese on top to melt).
     * Brioche buns are the best for hamburgers in my opinion, as they’re
       light and slightly sweet. Mine are from the swoon-worthy Brioche by
       Phillipe (four stores in Melbourne).

   Nachos with home-made salsa. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 4] Nachos

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   200g (7 oz) corn chips
   ♦ 1 heaped cup (300g/10 oz) (see recipe 1)
   1 cup (100g/3.5 oz) grated tasty cheese
   1 large avocado, mashed
   Sour cream
   Fresh coriander (cilantro), chopped

   Preheat oven to 180°C (350ºF).
   Line a large baking tray with baking paper.
   Arrange the corn chips into 4 piles, and sprinkle with half the grated
   cheese. Spoon reserved salsa over, and top with remaining cheese.
   Bake in preheated oven for 10 minutes, or until cheese is bubbling.
   Remove from oven.
   Top each serving with mashed avocado and a dollop of sour cream. Slide
   nachos stacks onto four separate plates, scatter with coriander and
   serve immediately.
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in BEANS, CHICKEN & DUCK, MEXICAN & SPANISH, SOUPS, VEGETARIAN |
   Tagged biber salçasi, brioche buns Melbourne, cooked salsa, home made
   salsa, nachos recipe, salsa soup, Turkish red pepper paste, turkish red
   pepper paste buy | 20 Replies

Christmas gift guide for foodies. All made in Melbourne!

   Posted on September 22, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   26

   Call me crazy but I started my Christmas gift buying months ago.
   Last-minute Chrissie shopping gives me the heebie jeebies! If you’d
   like to get in early too, here’s some inspiration. Everything below is
   food-related, and made with creativity and love in my home town,
   Melbourne.  Let’s support artisans and small businesses instead of
   the soulless multi-nationals. Happy shopping! xx

   2015 Christmas Gift Guide for foodies. Via One Equals Two. 1.
   Aacute Soy candle with gingerbread scent. $22 USD. Hand poured 100%
   natural soy wax candle, packaged in a miniature retro oven box.
   Available on etsy, along with the full Bakery Range of 24 scents,
   including Hot Jam Doughnut, Choc Brownie, Buttery popcorn and Crème
   brulée!
   2. EAT.ME.DO Tea Time socks. $18 AUD. 100% cotton socks featuring your
   fave Aussie bickies! Available here and at these stockists, along with
   other delectable wearable treats like jelly baby earrings, Iced Vovo
   brooches and Cheezel rings!
   3. BrewSmith Bacon-making kit. $22 USD. Yes, bacon you can make at
   home (OMG)! Contains cure, salt, sugar, meat thermometer, recipes,
   curing bags and instructions. Available on etsy, along with homebrew
   beer and cider kits.
   4. Lene Kuhl Jakobsen Round square bowls. $55 AUD for a set of 3. Small
   bowls, each hand-thrown from a cube of clay hence the beautiful uneven
   rims. More info here, available from these stockists.
   5. Full Tilt Nanna Hand crocheted fortune cookie with custom message.
   $11 USD. These cute little cookies can carry announcements, secrets or
   any other special wishes. You could place one on each Christmas lunch
   plate! Available on etsy, along with crocheted carrot, eggplant and
   chill pepper baby rattles!
   6. Neryl Winter Harvest (detail). Limited edition archival ink giclée
   print. A3 size $95 AUD. Original hand-drawn illustration inspired by
   Australian label Gorman’s Winter Harvest dress. Hand-numbered and
   signed, printed on natural cotton rag art paper. Created by artist
   Neryl Walker. Available here, along with more beautiful art, cushions
   and stickers.
   7. Evie Barrow Tooth fairy pouch. $14.81 USD. Hand-made ode to the most
   important food-eating tool! Cotton/linen, hand embroidered and lined
   inside to keep teeth safe and easy for the Tooth Fairy to retrieve.
   Comes with a hand numbered booklet. Created by Melbourne maker Evie
   Barrow. Available on etsy, along with gorgeous original art,
   one-of-a-kind textile characters and gift tags.
   8. Lucy Folk Taco friendship band. $65 – $75 AUD. Colourful bracelet
   with silver or gold taco, by Melbourne’s queen of wearable food.
   Sterling silver, yellow gold plate, rose gold plate and cotton.
   Available online here, at these world-wide stockists and in-store at 1A
   Crossley St, Melbourne.
   9. Kitiya Palaskas Chicken drumstick brooch. $20 AUD. Double-layered
   laser cut acrylic, gold-plated pin back, packaged on a riso-printed
   backing card. Available online here, along with Kitiya’s fab felt-cut
   food art, stickers, patches and jewellery.
   10. WirelyHome x Zin+Bert Concrete platter and side table. $48 USD (for
   platter only, stand sold separately). WirelyHome collab with concrete
   artist Erin Devenish (Zin+Bert). Concrete platter treated with
   food-safe honeydew wax that fits on Wirely’s plant stands, converting
   them into side tables. Available here, along with Wirely’s stylish
   candlesticks, oven door hooks and tea towels.
   11. Kirsten Perry Hand-built ceramic jug. $200 AUD. Imperfectly perfect
   sculptural jug by Melbourne ceramic artist Kirsten Perry. Available
   here, along with Kirsten’s uniquely beautiful cups, planters and
   cushions.
   12. Arteveneta Pasta measure. $33 AUD. Never cook too much or little
   pasta again! American oak or walnut pasta measure hand-crafted in
   Prahran by a father/son team. Available here, along with cheese boards,
   pepper mills and salt cellars.
   13. Emma Dilemmas Emporium Nautical gingham reversible apron. $33.32
   USD. Classic red gingham self-backed half apron made from vintage
   cotton, with appliquéd anchor and ric-rac trim. Available on etsy,
   along with cute cushions and lots more vintage-style aprons.
   14. Esther Sandler Fruit salad stickers. $2.96 USD. Stickers printed
   from an original hand-embroidered piece. Use them to brighten up your
   snail mail or decorate your Christmas presents! Each pack features 7
   fruits. Available on etsy along with Esther’s colourful bags, purses,
   cushion covers and magnets.
   15. Takeawei Fried egg brekky plate. $35 AUD. Handmade in North
   Melbourne. Fried egg plate to make your mornings sunny side up. Perfect
   for toast! Hand-painted, food safe, dishwasher safe and microwave safe.
   Available online here, along with lovingly hand-crafted mugs, tumblers,
   and plant hangers.
   Footnote: This is not a sponsored list. These are all items I genuinely
   love!
   Be sure to check item availability with the sellers and stockists; and
   confirm that delivery is possible before Christmas.
   Etsy shop prices are in USD. All other prices are in Australian
   dollars. Here’s a currency converter.
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHRISTMAS, CRAFT, DESIGN & ILLUSTRATION, OUT & ABOUT IN
   MELBOURNE | Tagged 2015 Christmas gift guide, Christmas gift guide,
   Christmas gift ideas, Christmas gift ideas Australia, food related
   gifts, foodie gifts Australia | 26 Replies

Remains of the day

   Posted on September 2, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   26

   [Recipe 1] TWO ROAST CHICKENS with HERBED VEGGIES
   [Recipe 2] NASI GORENG (Indonesian fried rice) with leftover roast
   chicken
   Excuse my OTT enthusing but these two meals are massive box tickers.
   Cheap? Yep! Easy? Yep! Tasty? Yep! Kid-friendly? Yeppity yep!
   First up is classic roast chicken. Roasting your own chook is an
   absolute cinch, and it takes no extra time to cook two; allowing for
   planned-overs to use during the week. Feel free to brush the chickens
   with olive oil, but I’m from the Margaret Fulton school of cookery and
   prefer lashings of butter.
   One of the best ways to use leftover chicken is in Nasi Goreng. I’m a
   Dutchie (born in Amersfoort) and have always loved Dutch-Indonesian
   meals such as bami and loempia. Nasi Goreng was our family favourite
   though, cooked up in an electric frying pan with deep-fried prawn
   crackers for scooping. My dad always added the traditional dollop of
   fiery sambal oelak, but nowadays I prefer a good squirt of sriracha. My
   parents’ secret ingredient was Conimex Nasi Goreng spice mix, made in
   the Netherlands and still available today. I’m not a huge fan of
   packaged spice mixes though and this one contains nasty palm oil and
   MSG. The spice paste recipe below is my copycat version!
   Roasted belachan (dried shrimp paste) is essential for a proper Nasi
   Goreng. It smells like a dead animal, but adds the most pungent salty
   kick to fried rice. It’s readily available in Asian food stores, and
   large supermarkets including Woolworths in Australia.
   Eet smakelijk (enjoy your meal)!

   Two roast chickens and herbed veggies. One Equals Two. Roast chicken
   and herbed veggies. One Equals Two. [Recipe 1] Two roast chickens with
   herbed veggies

   Ingredients (serves 4 people for 2 meals):
   2 free range chickens, 1.75 kilos (3.8 lb) each, rinsed and dried with
   kitchen paper
   60 grams (2 oz/½ stick) butter, melted
   Salt and freshly ground black pepper
   2 small limes
   6–8 chat potatoes, peeled, halved
   2 large red (purple/Spanish) onions, peeled and quartered
   4 small–medium carrots, peeled, cut into thirds
   1 red capsicum (bell pepper), de-seeded, cut into eighths
   2 zucchinis (courgettes), trimmed, halved lengthwise and crosswise
   1 tablespoon chopped fresh thyme and/or rosemary, as preferred
   Steamed green beans, to serve

   Preheat oven to 190°C (370ºF).
   Bring chickens to room temperature for half an hour, while you prepare
   the veggies.
   Place the chickens on a rack in a large roasting pan. I use a cookie
   rack over a large, deep tray that came with my oven, but two smaller
   pans side by side will suffice.
   Remove and discard any white blobby fat and large loose pieces of skin
   from around the chicken cavities. Brush the chickens all over with
   butter and season well with salt and pepper. Place a whole lime into
   each cavity, tie the drumsticks together with butchers twine and turn
   chickens breast-side down (ie. legs down, wings up).
   Arrange the potato pieces around the chickens and drizzle with
   remaining butter.
   Roasting stage 1 (50 mins): Roast for 50 minutes, tossing and basting
   the potatoes with the chicken juices after 25 minutes (or drizzle with
   a little olive oil if your chickens haven’t produced enough juice yet).
   Roasting stage 2 (40 mins): Carefully remove tray from oven and turn
   the chickens breast-side up. Add onion, carrots, capsicum and zucchini
   to the pan. Baste chicken and vegetables with pan juices; and scatter
   veggies with herbs, salt and pepper. Return pan to the oven and roast
   for a further 40 minutes, gently tossing the vegetables after 20
   minutes; until the chickens are golden brown, and juices run clear when
   the thick part of a thigh is pierced with a skewer. If juices run pink,
   return to the oven for a further ten minutes and test again.
   Total cooking time is 1½ hours (see notes below).
   Allow chickens to rest on a board, lightly covered with foil, for ten
   minutes.
   Remove and discard limes. Cut one chicken into quarters and serve
   immediately, with roasted veggies and steamed green beans.
   ♦ After dinner, strip off and discard the skin from the remaining
   chicken, and remove all the meat. Chop or slice the meat and store in a
   container in the fridge for up to 3 days, or freeze for up to 3 months.
     * Roasting time will vary depending on the weight of the chicken.
       Cook for 25 minutes per 500g (1 lb).
     * 1 x 1.75 kilo chicken yields approx 4 cups chopped chicken meat –
       you’ll need 2 cups meat for Recipe 2.
     * Leftover roast chicken is fantastic stirred through Vietnamese
       style coleslaw. Use this recipe, replacing the beef with sliced
       chicken. Remaining cabbage can be used in Recipe 2 (see below)!
     * Leftover roast veggies and chicken are delicious in toasties with
       pesto and Swiss cheese; or in wraps with caramelised red onion jam,
       cheddar and rocket (arugula).

   Nasi Goreng with leftover roast chicken. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 2] Nasi Goreng (Indonesian fried rice)

   Ingredients (serves 4, plus leftovers for lunch the next day):
   2 cups uncooked basmati rice
   2 tablespoons coconut oil (or peanut or vegetable oil if unavailable)
   125g (4.5 oz) bacon, chopped
   1 brown onion, finely diced
   ♦ 2 cups reserved roast chicken, chopped (see Recipe 1)
   600g (1.3 lb) raw veggies (I use ¼ cabbage, shredded; 2 corn cobs,
   kernels removed; 2 carrots, grated; ¼ green capsicum, diced and ½ cup
   frozen peas, defrosted)
   4 eggs
   Cracked black pepper
   To serve:
   Lime wedges
   Sriracha sauce
   Pre-cooked prawn crackers (optional)
   Nasi Goreng spice paste:
   20g (.7 oz) roasted belachan (dried shrimp paste)
   3 large garlic cloves, chopped
   ½ teaspoon salt
   ¼ cup Kecap manis
   2 teaspoons sesame oil
   3 teaspoons dried ground cumin

   Prepare Nasi Goreng spice paste by pounding belachan, garlic and salt
   with a mortar and pestle. Transfer to a small bowl and add other spice
   paste ingredients. Mix well. Refrigerate, covered, for up to 2 days
   until required.
   Cook rice according to packet instructions, by boiling rather than
   absorption. Rinse with cold water, drain well and allow to cool
   completely, covered, in the fridge. Rice can be prepared up to 2 days
   in advance.
   Heat oil in a large wok over a high heat, until just smoking. Add bacon
   and onion and stir-fry for 3 minutes.
   Add prepared Nasi Goreng spice paste and cook, stirring, for 2 minutes.
   Add prepared vegetables and stir-fry over a high heat for 2 minutes.
   Add the cooked, cooled rice to the wok with the reserved roast
   chicken. Toss gently for 2-3 minutes, until warmed through and
   well-coated in spice paste.
   Meanwhile, fry the eggs in a non-stick frying pan until cooked to your
   liking.
   Divide the Nasi Goreng amongst four bowls; reserving any leftovers for
   lunch the following day. Top each serving with a fried egg and scatter
   with pepper. Serve with lime wedges, sriracha sauce and prawn crackers.
     * Sriracha sauce, pre-cooked prawn crackers (krupuk), roasted
       belachan (dried shrimp paste) and kecap manis (sweet Indonesian soy
       sauce) are all available at large supermarkets and Asian food
       stores. You can replace belachan with 2 teaspoons fish sauce if
       unavailable, but the overall flavour will be milder.
     * Although my combination of veggies is recommended, particularly the
       cabbage, you can use other available vegetables to equal 600g (1.3
       lb); including leek, celery, bean sprouts and mushrooms.
     * You can use leftover cooked cooled rice for this dish. 2 cups
       uncooked basmati rice yields about 6 cups of cooked rice.
     * An ultra hot wok is imperative for perfect fried rice. If your wok
       is small and likely to be overloaded, you can cook the nasi
       goreng in two batches.
     * Leftover Nasi Goreng is excellent for lunch, reheated gently in a
       microwave. For a touch of freshness, scatter with chopped spring
       onions or sliced cucumber. You can also add a finely sliced
       omelette. My kids take warmed leftover Nasi Goreng in little
       thermoses to school (note: if your school has a nut-free policy, be
       sure to use coconut or vegetable oil for frying, rather than peanut
       oil).

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHICKEN, DUTCH, LUNCHBOX TREATS, PASTA & RICE | Tagged 2 cups
   uncooked rice yields, belacan, belachan, conimex nasi goreng mix
   recipe, homemade nasi goreng paste, Indonesian fried rice, nasi goreng,
   nasi goreng spices, roast chicken cooking time, two roast chickens | 26
   Replies

Let’s talk about Mex

   Posted on August 6, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   24

   Leftover par-boiled potatoes from this recipe transform into
   BREAKFAST BURRITOS with CRISPY FRIED POTATOES, SCRAMBLED EGGS and
   PAN-FRIED SALSA
   On our road trip through the US we ate and ate. And ate. I look way
   porkier in the photos taken towards the end of our holiday, but it was
   totally worth it! We traveled mainly through the Southwest, so that
   meant the 3 B’s – burgers, burritos and the occasional brisket. Oh, and
   beer!
   If you can bare more holiday photos, scroll down past the actual recipe
   for snaps of some of the diners, cafes and taquerías we visited – all
   free-standing (a feature we don’t see in Melbourne), mostly family-run
   and all utterly beautiful.
   I reckon I ate my weight in Breakfast Burritos. El Rancho Hotel in
   Gallup, New Mexico (one of our hotel highlights) served up theirs with
   crispy fried potatoes, and… oh my gawd! We’ve long been fans of
   scrambled egg burritos for brekkie, but the addition of crunchy spuds
   elevates this simple dish to a complete meal. Since we’ve been home,
   we’ve enjoyed these babies for dinner a couple of times and they’re
   immensely satisfying.
   The recipe below is my take on El Rancho’s burritos. My Proper fish and
   chips allow for a planned-over stash of cooked potatoes, which I
   usually throw into a Spanish tortilla for dinner the following night;
   but they’re equally beautiful fried ’til they’re golden and crispy,
   stuffed into a burrito, with creamy scrambled eggs, a spoonful of
   pan-fried salsa (tomato, onion and green pepper) and a splash of hot
   sauce. ¡Buen apetito!
   PS. If you’re serving this up to kids, you’ll be a hero! Older children
   will love it as is. For littlies, omit the pan-fried salsa and it’s
   basically an egg and chip wrap 😉

   Breakfast burritos with scrambled eggs. One Equals Two. Best crispy
   fried potatoes! One Equals Two. Breakfast burrito with crispy potatoes.
   One Equals Two. [Recipe 1] Breakfast burritos with crispy fried
   potatoes, scrambled eggs and pan-fried salsa

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   1 cup olive oil (+ extra ½ cup if required) 
   ♦ 4 cups reserved par-boiled potato pieces, cut into small cubes (see
   Recipe 1 in this post which allows for leftover cooked potatoes)
   1 small red (purple/Spanish) onion, diced
   1 green poblano pepper, de-seeded and diced (or ½ green capsicum)
   12 cherry tomatoes, or baby Roma tomatoes, halved
   1 tablespoon butter
   8 free-range eggs
   ¼ cup full-cream milk
   Salt and freshly-cracked black pepper
   4 large (or 8 small) flour tortillas, wrapped in foil, warmed in a low
   oven for 10 minutes
   To serve:
   Chopped flat-leaf parsley
   Mexican hot sauce (we love El Yucateco)

   Heat 1 cup of oil in a large cast iron or heavy non-stick pan, until
   shimmering.
   ♦ Dry reserved par-boiled potato cubes with kitchen paper.
   With a slotted spoon, carefully add potato cubes to the hot oil in a
   single layer, pressing them down lightly. They should be almost covered
   with oil – add the extra ½ cup oil if required. Cook without stirring,
   on medium to high heat, for 10 minutes. Carefully flip the potatoes
   over and fry for a further 10–12 minutes, turning occasionally, until
   golden brown and crisp. Remove potatoes with a slotted spoon and drain
   on kitchen paper. Season well with salt and pepper, and cover loosely
   with foil to keep warm.
   Pour oil into a jar to re-use another time (see these tips), leaving a
   small amount in the pan. For the pan-fried salsa, add the onion and
   green pepper to the pan and fry gently until onion is softened, about 5
   minutes. Add tomatoes and stir gently until warmed through. Remove from
   the heat and set aside.
   Melt butter in a small non-stick saucepan. Lightly whisk together the
   eggs and milk, and pour into the pan. Cook over a low heat, stirring
   continuously, for about 5 minutes, until the eggs are set and
   scrambled. Season with salt and pepper.
   Divide fried potatoes amongst the warmed tortillas. Spoon the scrambled
   eggs alongside, top with pan-fried salsa and a splash of hot sauce.
   Roll up to enclose and serve immediately.
     * If starting this recipe from scratch (without leftover cooked
       potato pieces), you’ll need 6 large potatoes (approx. 1.125
       kilos/2.5lb), par-boiled according to this recipe.
     * If you have a large stove top, you can of course expedite
       proceedings by having two pans on at once. Cook the potatoes and
       pan-fried salsa at the same time. Remove the pan-fried salsa when
       cooked through and keep warm on a plate loosely covered with foil.
       Cook the eggs in the last 5 minutes of the potato cooking time.

   Joe & Aggie's Cafe, Holbrook, AZ La Cita, Tucumcari, NM El Gallito,
   Cathedral City, CA Delgadillo's Snow Cap, Seligman, AZ Coyote Bluff
   Cafe, Amarillo, TX Roadkill Cafe, Seligman, AZ Black Cat Bar, Seligman,
   AZ Cindy's. Eagle Rock, LA Mary & Tito's, Albuquerque, NM Ranch House
   Cafe, Tucumcari, NM
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in MEXICAN & SPANISH, USA HOLIDAY, VEGETARIAN | Tagged breakfast
   burrito, breakfast burrito with potato, fried breakfast potatoes, home
   fries, leftover boiled potatoes, Mexican fried potatoes | 24 Replies

American Express (6 week road trip in one blog post)!

   Posted on June 24, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   41

   So ridiculous but I’ve been procrastinating over this post for ever!
   I’m going to attempt to summarise our road trip through Southwest USA,
   and whittle down 2000 photos, in one post. Here’s a speedy summary:
   Started in LA (Disneyland!) > Palm Springs > along Route 66 through
   Arizona > side trip to Monument Valley > back down to New
   Mexico > along Route 66 through Texas and Oklahoma, then home. About
   1700 miles of driving, and it was beyond amazing. Here are just a
   few highlights:
   I met my ‘penfriend’. Kim is a fellow blogger, and super talented maker
   of mobiles (which you should check out). We’ve connected through our
   blogs over the past few years, and never dreamed we’d actually meet,
   but we did, twice! Kim blogged about it here, with more photos. Our
   families caught up for dinner at the fab Cindys in Eagle Rock LA, where
   I tried grits for the first time (ahem, an acquired taste I reckon).
   That’s us below (Kim left, me right). We also hung out at the
   mind-blowing Rose Bowl Flea Market in Pasadena. A big mwah to you
   lovely Kim and family. Hope we can meet again one day.
   Palm Springs, LA. I suffered camera elbow there. Too much mid century
   goodness! I won’t bore you with photos of the houses, but you can see
   ’em on Instagram (if you like).
   Noah Purifoy’s Desert Art Museum, Joshua Tree. In the middle of the
   desert and just incredible. Our boys were enthralled as they were able
   to walk through, touch and explore everything – not your average
   museum!
   We made s’mores. One of our motel highlights was the Blue Swallow in
   Tucumcari, New Mexico. The owners, Kevin and Nancy, put on a barbecued
   s’mores feast for us and the other guests. S’mores, where have you been
   all my life? So simple, so gooey, so damn delicious!
   Wigwam Motel, Arizona. We stayed in many cool mom n’ pop motels along
   Route 66, but the concrete teepee was an absolute family favourite!
   Monument Valley, Utah. We had a little cabin right on the edge of the
   valley, and pinched ourselves each morning. The views! We did actually
   see a real live road runner, but no sighting of Wile E. Coyote.
   Tinkertown Museum in Sandia Park, NM; created and hand-carved by one
   man, Ross Ward, over 40 years; and the Museum of International Folk Art
   in Santa Fe are the best museums in the world in my humble opinion. I
   almost cried in both. I have no words. Our boys adored them too – all
   those mini dioramas!
   Route 66 itself was a revelation. Call me mental but I’ve been
   contemplating starting another blog to share more photos – the signs,
   the big things (so many dinosaurs and muffler men), the wildlife
   (burros, mustangs, gophers, elks), the beautiful decay, the diners, the
   trading posts, the rock shops, the people, the cars, the things our
   kids loved… The Mother Road is worthy of way more than a snippety blog
   post.
   Will share food memories and US/Mex/Tex recipes soon. USA we ♥ you!
   PS. If you’re still awake, and can bare looking at even more holiday
   snaps, the husband and I signed up to Instagram just before we left.
   Yikes! Another screen addiction! You can find me here, and my man here.

   Kim and Sas Palm Springs dinosaurs Noah Purifoy Desert Art Museum,
   Joshua Tree Blue Swallow Motel, Tucumcari S'mores at the Blue Swallow
   Wigwam Motel, Holbrook, AZ Wigwam Motel, Arizona 'The View' cabins at
   Monument Valley Santa Fe Santa Fe, NM Museum of International Folk Art,
   Santa Fe Tinkertown Museum, NM Rock Shop, Holbrook, AZ Yellow Horse
   Trading Post, AZ Wild donkey, Oatman Route 66 to Oatman, Arizona
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in USA HOLIDAY | Tagged Route 66, Route 66 with kids, USA road
   trip | 41 Replies

Sea life’s beauty

   Posted on March 1, 2015 by Saskia (1=2)
   41

   Helllooo! My first post for 2015. Where did all that time go? 2014 was
   frankly an awful and emotional year, with the loss of three beautiful
   family members (my dad, stepdad and grandma) and I came pretty close
   myself with a nasty dose of sepsis.
   By contrast, this year is looking great. We had a fab holiday after
   Christmas in Apollo Bay with friends; reading, wining, chatting,
   swimming and lounging around – exactly what the doctor ordered. A food
   highlight was our brekkie of Baked oatmeal (recipe from the
   talented Chef in Disguise), served with yogurt and fresh cherries. So
   yum.
   We were back home for a day of frantic washing and re-packing before
   setting off on a camping trip to Wilson’s Promontory. For years friends
   have been shocked that we’ve never been to ‘the Prom’, and now I know
   why! It’s a spectacular conglomeration of almost every element of
   nature – river, surf beach, massive boulders, bush, hiking trails and
   so many furry friends. Our nightly visitor was an elderly cantankerous
   wallaby. I took so many photos of him one day that he hopped over and
   chomped me on the hand. The husband scored a bite on the knee from an
   angry wombat, also for getting in too close for a photo. Bloody city
   slickers we are, serves us right!
   We worked our way through an almost embarrassing amount of food,
   including chilli con carne (see below); a family favourite that is
   nearly always in our freezer. It’s perfect camping fare with smashed
   avocado and rice.
   See you all soon. We’re ticking off one of our lifetime dreams tomorrow
   and are heading to the USA for a 6.5 week road trip along Route 66.
   We’ve found a house-sitter, packed our bags, researched our butts off
   and are so excited. I (finally!) signed up for Instagram yesterday, so
   do join me there or on Facebook for holiday updates. Bye lovely
   readers. xxx

   Baked oatmeal and fresh cherries Tidal River Wilsons Prom Wilsons
   Promontary Cranky wallaby Wilsons Prom bush walk Chilli con carne with
   smashed avocado. One Equals Two.
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE | Tagged Apollo Bay, Baked oatmeal,
   Chilli con carne, Wilson's Promontory | 41 Replies

Totally rawsome

   Posted on December 29, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   37

   [Recipe 1] MEXICAN BLACK BEAN and CORN SALAD with QUESO FRESCO
   transforms into
   [Recipe 2] FLATHEAD TACOS with BLACK BEAN SALSA and CHIPOTLE MAYO
   It’s entertaining season around here, and ‘stealing salad’ is a sneaky
   way to get two meals from one. Mexican black bean and corn salad is
   perfect for a potluck or BBQ and by pilfering 3 cups of prepared
   ingredients (before adding the avocado and Queso Fresco) and 3
   tablespoons of dressing; you’ll have a ready-made salsa, to spoon into
   tacos with crumbed flathead and chipotle mayo for dinner the next day.
   My ten year old’s verdict – DELICIOUS!
   I served this up at two Christmas lunches last week. The recipe is
   adapted from one my son made at school – he’s lucky enough to be part
   of the Stephanie Alexander Kitchen program, where ingredients are
   plucked straight from the school veggie patch and cooked up by the
   kids.
   This salad is a bowl of health, choc-full of raw veggies, and lots of
   texture and colour. I mucked around with the original recipe, adding
   mild chillies and onion, swapping lettuce for shredded red cabbage and
   replacing fetta with Mexican Queso Fresco. Damn I LOVE this cheese.
   It’s admittedly tricky to find, but well worth the hunt. it’s smooth
   and mild, holds its shape well and has a little kick of saltiness – the
   perfect salad cheese.
   Wishing you all a very Happy New Year. See you in 2015! xx
   PS. I had to share my vintage Japanese ‘Hostess’ brand salad servers. I
   love the wood/ceramic combination and the crazy colours. I found the
   red ones a couple of weeks ago. Do three sets constitute a collection?
   I hope so, as calling myself ‘a collector’ surely justifies me buying
   more…

   Vintage Hostess salad servers Mexican salad with Queso Fresco. One
   Equals Two. [Recipe 1] Mexican black bean and corn salad with Queso
   Fresco

   Ingredients (makes salad for 8–10 people, plus tacos for 4):
   250g (9 oz) dried black beans, soaked overnight (or tinned beans – see
   notes)
   4 firm, ripe tomatoes, seeds and core roughly scooped out and
   discarded, chopped
   2 cups uncooked corn kernels (cut from 2 large corn cobs)
   1 white salad onion, peeled and finely diced
   3 cups very finely shredded red cabbage (from ½ a cabbage)
   2 red capsicums (bell peppers), de-seeded, finely chopped
   2 long red chillies, de-seeded, very finely chopped
   Lime dressing:
   100 ml (3.4 oz) lime juice (from 2–3 limes)
   ½ cup olive oil
   4 tablespoons maple syrup
   1 large garlic clove, very finely chopped
   ½ teaspoon sea salt
   (Note: you’ll be reserving 3 cups of the above salad ingredients, and 3
   tablespoons of lime dressing, for the tacos in recipe 2)
   To serve:
   2 avocados, diced
   1 cup chopped fresh coriander (cilantro)
   125g (4.5 oz) Queso Fresco (replace with firm fetta if unavailable),
   crumbled
   Corn chips, smashed (optional)

   Drain soaked black beans, place into a large saucepan and cover with
   water. Bring to the boil. Simmer for 40–50 minutes until just tender.
   Take care not to overcook them as they should retain a bit of bite.
   Drain, rinse and place in a large bowl. Allow to cool.
   Add tomatoes, corn kernels, onion, cabbage, capsicum and chillies. Toss
   gently.
   ♦ Reserve 3 cups of salad mix for the flathead tacos with black bean
   salsa (recipe 2).
   To make the lime dressing, place ingredients in a screw-top jar and
   shake well.
   ♦ Reserve 3 tablespoons dressing for the flathead tacos with black bean
   salsa (recipe 2).
   Refrigerate salad ingredients and dressing separately, covered, until
   ready to serve. Both can be prepared the night before.
   To serve, gently stir the large quantity of dressing through the large
   bowl of salad ingredients. Scatter with avocado, coriander, crumbled
   Queso Fresco and smashed corn chips (if using). Serve immediately.
     * 250g (9 oz) dried black beans yields approximately 3 cups cooked
       beans. You can replace the cooked beans with 2 x 400g (15 oz) cans
       black beans, drained and rinsed.
     * Although the corn chips are optional, kids will thank you for them!
       You can serve them in a separate bowl, alongside the salad. Guests
       can grab a handful and smash them over their own serve.
     * Dried black beans are available in Melbourne from Casa Iberica,
       Oasis Bakery, El Cielo and La Tortilleria; and in Sydney from
       Fireworks Foods. They can also be purchased online from guaca
       Mall-e.
     * Queso Fresco (‘fresh cheese’) is available in Melbourne at Casa
       Iberica and in Sydney at Fireworks Foods.
     * Be sure to scatter the avocado on top of the salad, rather than
       stir it through. If there is any leftover dressed salad, you can
       pick off the avocado and it will keep well for a couple of days –
       it’s great to take to work for lunch!
     * Reserved salad mixture and dressing (for the tacos) can be stored
       in the fridge, covered, for up to 3 days.

   Flathead tacos with black bean salsa. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 2] Flathead tacos with black bean salsa and chipotle mayo

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   ♦ 3 cups reserved salad mix (see above)
   ♦ 3 tablespoons reserved lime dressing (see above)
   400g (14 oz) flathead (or other firm white fish, such as whiting)
   fillets
   ½ cup plain (all-purpose) flour
   2 eggs, beaten
   1½ cups panko breadcrumbs
   Olive oil for shallow frying
   8 blue corn tortillas (see notes)
   Chipotle mayo

   ♦ To make black bean salsa, combine reserved salad mix and reserved
   lime dressing. Dredge flathead fillets in flour, dip into beaten eggs
   and coat well in breadcrumbs. Refrigerate, covered, until required.
   Pour oil into a large non-stick frying pan, to about 3mm (.1″) deep.
   Shallow-fry the crumbed flathead fillets in batches for about 2–3
   minutes each side, until light golden brown. Drain on kitchen paper.
   Warm tortillas in a dry non-stick pan. Arrange flathead fillets and a
   good plop of black bean salsa on each. Drizzle with chipotle mayo, and
   serve immediately.
     * Blue corn tortillas are available in-store and online from
       Fireworks Foods in Sydney and El Cielo in Melbourne.
     * Japanese panko breadcrumbs make for an extra crispy coating.
       They’re available at large supermarkets and Asian grocers.
     * If using large pieces of fish, cut into strips before coating.

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in BEANS, MEXICAN & SPANISH, SIDES & SALADS, VEGETARIAN | Tagged
   1 can black beans yields, blackbeans-dried-to-canned, Fish tacos,
   Mexican bean salad, Queso Fresco Australia, Queso Fresco Melbourne,
   Queso Fresco Sydney | 37 Replies

Best Western

   Posted on December 17, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   15

   8 sleeps ’til Christmas! I’ve had the most [DEL: mental :DEL] lovely
   couple of weeks. We set up our Christmas tree, visited the Myer windows
   and I’ve been on a catering frenzy: 50 cupcakes, 60 meatballs, 4 cakes,
   2 kilos of chutney, a kilo of ugly but super delicious Syrian red
   pepper, pomegranate and walnut dip (see below), and a huge load of
   Keema mattar (to take on our upcoming camping trip). Also somehow
   squeezed in some work, Christmas parties, gift shopping and
   present-wrapping. I need a nap.
   I also spent an entire day cruising the Wild West. I live in
   Melbourne’s south, and last year I lead a group of Western and Northern
   suburbs lovely lady friends on an op-shop crawl of my area. Our
   Yarraville pal reciprocated recently with a sight-seeing daytrip around
   the West. We’ve become a group of little old ladies with our
   self-organised tours!
   Our Western excursion started with tacos at La Tortilleria in
   Kensington. Melbourne peeps, if you’ve not eaten there yet, run!
   Afternoon tea was the holiest cannoli at T Cavallaro and Sons in
   Footscray – just look at that perfect crunchy pastry and glistening
   custard!
   We finished our day with a stroll through Little Saigon Market and
   Sweet Grass Bonsai, fabric shopping at Maze and Vale (how cute is the
   mushroom fabric?) and a spot of junk hunting (I scored a magnificent
   Viking tapestry).
   Our friend Andrew, one of my favourite cooks, had toiled in the kitchen
   while we were out and laid on an amazing dinner of Puy lentil and fig
   salad, falafel and teeny quail eggs with dukkah and za’atar (photo
   below). All in all, a jam-packed, perfect day!
   I’m guessing it’s a crazy time of year for you too? Wishing you all the
   very best for whatever you’re celebrating; Christmas, Mawlid al-Nabi,
   Chanukah or Summer/Winter Holidays! xx

   Christmas tree! Syrian red pepper, pomegranate and walnut dip La
   Tortilleria, Kensington La Tortilleria Cavallaro and sons cannoli
   Cavallaro and sons, Footscray Maze and Vale fabric Vintage viking
   tapestry Quail eggs and dukkah
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE | Tagged La Tortilleria, Maze and
   vale, Red pepper dip, T. Cavallaro & Sons | 15 Replies

2014 Christmas giveaway. 11 foodie prizes! (closed)

   Posted on November 24, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   10

   YAY! It’s my blogiversary – One Equals Two is now 3 years old. It’s
   also time for my annual Food-related Christmas Giveaway, and this
   year’s prize pack is the biggest and best yet! One lucky winner will
   score eleven fab items; including an Arro Home geometric apron, Gorman
   socks and some ace stuff for kids too!
   This competition is open to everyone, anywhere in the world. See
   official rules below the photo.
   Here’s how to enter:
   • Head over to the Facebook competition link.
   • Submit your email address in the field provided (PS. I don’t store or
   use email addresses, they’re just for contacting the winner). The
   winner will be randomly selected via woobox.
   Entries close 7th December at 10.30pm (AEST). The winner will be
   contacted, and announced right here on the blog and on Facebook, on 8th
   December.
   Here’s the list of loot:
   1. Ice cream notepad by Poppies for Grace, Melbourne.
   440 sheets (220 circles in 11 colours + 220 triangles in 6 colours).
   Ideal for place settings, bunting, a giant confetti wall or combined to
   make paper ice creams.
   2. Geometric apron by Arro Home (Beci Orpin’s homeware range),
   Melbourne.
   Cotton geometric print apron with contrasting coloured binding.
   3. Eco shopping tote by Mogu Takahaski, Japan.
   100% cotton silkscreened tote with handmade button sewn on the nose.
   Great for farmer’s markets! PS. The cat is saying ‘Who are you?’ in
   Japanese.
   4. Mouk in Australia plate by Petit Jour Paris.
   Melamine kids plate featuring Mouk and his pals on Kangaroo Island by
   Marc Boutavant.
   5. Jam jar ‘chalkboard’ stickers by Cocobohème, France.
   Reusable stickers for your jars of homemade jam and preserves. Write on
   them with chalk and wipe clean! Dishwasher-safe. 4 pack of labels, 16
   labels total.
   6. Ice cream girl art print by Emily Nelson, Brisbane.
   Original ‘ice cream girl’ illustration, A4 print on archival paper.
   7. Doodle Cake Crayon kit by Alex Toys, Italy.
   Recycle your old crayon bits into cupcake crayons! Includes silicon
   baking mold, 8 colors of crayon crumbles, spoon, doily and easy
   instructions. Age: 6+
   8. Hundreds and Thousands (nonpareils) socks by Gorman, Melbourne.
   Nude-coloured bobby socks with embroidered coloured dots.
   9. Sugar Skull DIY bag-tag craft kit by Re-sew-cool, Melbourne.
   Includes pattern, instructions, sewing needle, recycled felt, recycled
   buttons, trim, natural fibre yarn and swivel clasp. Age: 10+
   10. Citrus pencil/makeup purse by Kikki K, Melbourne.
   Cute purse, fully-lined with light pink seed-patterned fabric.
   11. Christmas tags by Emily Nelson, Brisbane.
   3 gingerbread men and 3 candy cane Christmas gift tags with natural
   twine.
   PS. This is not a sponsored competition. I paid for everything all by
   myself!
   Please see official rules below photo.
   Update 8/12/14: Huge congrats to Lisa Rafferty, the randomly-chosen
   winner!

   2014 Christmas Giveaway. Everyone welcome! One Equals Two 2014
   Christmas giveaway. Official rules.
   Participation in this promotion is subject to the following terms and
   conditions.
   One lucky winner will win the 11 items described and pictured above.
   The competition is open to everyone, worldwide. Shipping/delivery costs
   will be covered by One Equals Two.
   Only one direct email entry, via the official entry form, per person is
   permitted. Each entrant may also be awarded 1 bonus entry if the
   competition is shared on the entrant’s Facebook timeline and a user
   clicks and enters from the entrant’s shared link.
   The Competition starts on 24/11/2014 and ends on 7/12/2014 (10.30pm
   AEST).
   This is a game of chance, and the winner will be randomly drawn via
   woobox on 8/12/2014. The winner’s name will be announced on the One
   Equals Two Facebook page and the One Equals Two website.
   To take part: please visit the official entry form link, and submit
   your email address via the field provided. Email addresses are required
   to contact the winner only and will not be stored or sold. One Equals
   Two will notify the winner using the email address provided. It is up
   to entrants to ensure the email address provided is accurate and valid!
   If the potential winner cannot be contacted or fails to respond to the
   winner notification within 7 days (by 14/12/14 at 10:30pm AEST), One
   Equals Two reserves the right to then randomly choose a new winner.
   You must be a member of facebook.com in order to enter this
   competition; however this promotion is in no way sponsored, endorsed or
   administered by, or associated with, Facebook. You are providing your
   information to One Equals Two and not to Facebook. By participating in
   this promotion you agree to a complete release of Facebook from any
   claims.
   Prizes are awarded ‘as is’ with no warranty or guarantee. One Equals
   Two is not liable for any damages or loss that may occur during
   shipping.
   Good luck!
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHRISTMAS, CRAFT | Tagged christmas competition 2014,
   christmas competitions, Christmas giveaway, competitions australia | 10
   Replies

Seasonings Greetings (3 ways with dukkah)

   Posted on November 13, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   25

   [Recipe 1] PISTACHIO and ALMOND DUKKAH transforms into
   [Recipe 2] SPICED LAMB PIZZA (lahm bi ajine)
   [Recipe 3] SPICED HONEY DUKKAH POPCORN
   [Recipe 4] CHAR-GRILLED DUKKAH LAMB with TRAY-ROASTED VEGGIES
   It seriously feels like we packed away the Christmas tree two months
   ago. I cannot BELIEVE we’re half-way through November. Yikes!
   Every Christmas I make a massive batch of something sweet or spicy to
   pop into jars for teachers, family and friends. Za’atar was popular,
   and dukkah is equally tasty and a cinch to whip up and package;
   especially if you employ child labour in your home, as we do.
   I buy my fabric pieces at Amitié – they have a huge basket of off-cuts,
   the perfect size for topping jars. The raw tangerine string is from
   Araliya. It’s handmade from coconut fibre, and it was a birthday
   pressie (thanks Chris)!
   For a more substantial gift, a small spice bowl could be added – Ingrid
   Tufts makes beautiful little hand-thrown porcelain condiment bowls.
   My dukkah is adapted from Greg Malouf’s recipe in one of my most
   thumbed-through, dog-eared cookbooks, Arabesque. I made a couple of
   adjustments, replacing the hazelnuts with toasted pistachios and
   almonds (I’m far too lazy to skin a bulk load of hazelnuts). I also
   used less salt, adding a touch of thyme. Dried thyme is great for
   adding a salt-like kick to spice blends.
   Dukkah is a flavour explosion! It can be sprinkled with gay abandon on
   just about anything; including poached eggs, salad or veggies (eg. my
   roasted cauliflower and chestnuts with dukkah).
   Here are three more great ways to use dukkah. You’ll find the recipes
   below.
   Spiced lamb pizza is a traditional Lebanese treat which usually
   contains allspice and/or cumin. In my humble opinion dukkah tastes even
   better.
   Spiced honey dukkah popcorn is salty, sweet, spicy and incredibly
   moreish. We had fun experimenting and taste-testing this recipe – four
   enormous bowls, now gone!
   Char-grilled dukkah lamb is a family favourite, and quick to prepare.
   Served with tahini sauce and tray-roasted veggies, it makes a
   super-tasty, healthy meal. Leftover roasted veggies and lamb, if any,
   can be tossed through a simple rocket, freekeh or couscous salad, and
   dressed with tahini sauce. We often cook up double the lamb and veggies
   for this purpose. Enjoy!

   Pistachio dukkah. One Equals Two. 3 ways with dukkah. By One Equals
   Two. Home-made pistachio dukkah. One Equals Two. [Recipe 1] Pistachio
   and almond dukkah

   Ingredients (bulk quantity – makes 23 cups, to fill 25–27 jars)
   4½ cups (450g) ground coriander
   4 cups (450g) ground cumin
   ½ cup (40g) dried thyme leaves
   1 tablespoon fine sea salt
   3 tablespoons (25g) fine white pepper
   8 cups (1 kilo) sesame seeds, toasted
   4 cups (575g) almonds, toasted (or store-bought unsalted dry roasted)
   2½ cups (325g) pistachio kernels, toasted

   Place coriander, cumin, thyme, salt, pepper and half the toasted sesame
   seeds into a large bowl and mix well. Blend almonds, pistachios and the
   remaining toasted sesame seeds in batches in a food processor,
   transferring to the bowl of dried spices as you go. Don’t grind them
   too fine or you’ll end up with a paste! Nuts should be chunky, and just
   broken.
   Divide dukkah into sterilised jars, top the lids with a small square of
   fabric and seal with string. You can fashion your own funnel from
   cardboard, to make pouring into the jars easier. Reserve some dukkah
   for yourself, for the three recipes below!
   Very loosely based on Greg Malouf’s recipe in Arabesque.
     * You can toast your own sesame seeds or buy them pre-roasted from
       Asian and Middle Eastern food stores.
     * Spices can be bought in bulk from Asian and Middle Eastern food
       stores. Mine were purchased, as always, from Oasis; where you can
       also find pre-shelled pistachios!
     * Most dukkah recipes call for whole coriander and cumin seeds,
       crushed in a spice or coffee grinder, or manually with a mortar and
       pestle. When making dukkah in bulk, pre-ground spices are
       recommended, as the crushing would take weeks! Incidentally, food
       processors aren’t great for seed-crushing as the seeds slip past
       the blades.
     * Dukkah should be stored in a cool dry place, and will keep for 3–6
       months.

   Spiced lamb pizza with tahini sauce. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 2] Spiced lamb pizza (lahm bi ajine)

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   1 quantity wholemeal (wholewheat) pizza dough
   2 tablespoons olive oil for brushing
   400g (14 oz) lamb backstraps, leg or fillets
   ♦ 3 teaspoons Pistachio and almond dukkah (see recipe above)
   2 teaspoons pomegranate molasses
   1 small red (purple/Spanish) onion, finely diced
   2 firm Roma or vine-ripened tomatoes, seeds and liquid scooped out,
   diced
   To serve:
   Tahini sauce
   Fresh chopped flat-leaf parsley
   Lemon wedges (these are a must)!
   Tomato and cucumber salad

   Preheat oven to 250°C (480ºF).
   Place two pizza trays into the hot oven to warm up, for at least 10
   minutes. This is an important step for crispy-based pizzas.
   Divide wholemeal pizza dough into four. Sprinkle flour on work surface.
   Roll out each piece of dough into a log shape with your hands. With a
   rolling pin, roll each log into a large flat oval, approx. 12 x 30cm (5
   x 12″). Lift the four bases onto two sheets of baking paper.
   Place the chopped lamb, Pistachio and almond dukkah and pomegranate
   molasses into a food processor and process until minced.
   Brush each pizza base lightly with olive oil.
   Arrange the prepared lamb, onion and tomato over each base, leaving a
   2cm (.8″) border.
   Carefully slide pizzas and baking paper onto pre-heated pizza trays and
   bake for 10–12 minutes. Cook separately if they don’t fit side by side.
   Remove from oven. Scatter with fresh parsley and serve with lemon
   wedges for squeezing; and Tomato and cucumber salad.
   Recipe very loosely adapted from this one by Greg Malouf.
     * Pomegranate molasses is available from specialty stores like
       Essential Ingredient, and Middle Eastern grocers such as Oasis or
       A1 Bakery. It’s lovely in Freekeh salad dressed with lemon
       pomegranate dressing.

   Honey-spiced dukkah popcorn. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 3] Spiced honey dukkah popcorn

   Ingredients (makes 12 cups):
   40g (1.5 oz) organic coconut oil
   ½ cup popcorn kernels
   60 grams (2 oz/½ stick) butter
   2 tablespoons honey
   ♦ 2 tablespoons Pistachio and almond dukkah (see recipe above)
   ½ teaspoon sea salt

   Melt the coconut oil in your largest saucepan, over medium-high heat.
   Add the popcorn kernels and cover.
   When the kernels begin to pop, gently shake the pan now and again to
   prevent burning. Once the popping slows down to 2 or 3 seconds between
   each pop, remove the pan from the heat and tip popcorn into a large
   bowl.
   Melt the butter and honey in a small saucepan. Add Pistachio and almond
   dukkah and salt and stir to combine.
   Pour over the popcorn and stir to coat evenly. Tip into a large bowl
   and serve.

   Dukkah lamb with tray-roasted veggies. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 4] Char-grilled dukkah lamb with tray-roasted veggies

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   2 x large lamb backstraps (approx. 500g/1.1 lb total)
   ¼ cup olive oil 
   ♦ ⅓ cup Pistachio and almond dukkah (see recipe above), plus extra to
   serve
   Vegetables for roasting: 
   650g (1.4 lb) kipfler potatoes, unpeeled, scrubbed, halved
    3 smallish sweet potatoes (approx. 500g/1.1 lb), unpeeled, scrubbed,
   cut into wedges
    2 red (purple/Spanish) onions, peeled, quartered 
   2 medium zucchini, each halved lengthwise and cut into 4
    ⅓ cup olive oil 
   Sea salt flakes and freshly-cracked black pepper
   To serve:
   Tahini sauce
   Fresh chopped coriander

   Place lamb pieces in a non-metallic dish or bowl.
   ♦ Combine olive oil and Pistachio and almond dukkah and spread over the
   lamb pieces. Cover and allow to marinate for at least one hour or
   overnight.
   Preheat oven to 220°C (425°F).
   Place halved potatoes in a saucepan and cover with water. Bring to the
   boil, and simmer for 5 minutes, until just tender. Drain and pat dry
   with a clean tea towel.
   Place par-boiled potatoes, sweet potato, onions, zucchini and oil into
   a large bowl. Toss to coat. Place into a large (preferably cast iron)
   baking pan, scatter with salt and pepper and roast for 45–50 minutes,
   turning every 10–15 minutes, until golden brown. Remove from oven and
   set aside. Veggies can be served warm or at room temperature.
   When you’re ready to serve, cook the lamb. Preheat a lightly-oiled
   barbecue or chargrill plate to medium–high heat. Cook lamb for 4
   minutes each side, or until cooked to your liking. We like ours
   rare-ish. Set aside to rest for 5 minutes.
   Slice lamb thickly across the grain. To serve, pile roasted veggies
   onto four plates. Top with sliced lamb, drizzle with tahini sauce and
   scatter with coriander and extra dukkah.
     * Char-grilled dukkah lamb is great for feeding a large crowd. To
       serve ten people, you’ll need 1.5 kilo (3.3 lb) lamb backstraps, ¾
       cup olive oil and 1 cup Pistachio and almond dukkah. Cook the lamb
       on the BBQ, and serve with double quantity tahini sauce.
     * Veggies are a guide only. Feel free to toss unpeeled pumpkin
       wedges, carrot slices and/or halved firm Roma tomatoes into the
       roasting pan.
     * Char-grilled dukkah lamb is also delicious served with Farro salad.
     * Kid tip: Kids will love the char-grilled lamb in a wrap with tahini
       sauce (or smashed avocado), grated carrot and lettuce. Pluck some
       roast potato and sweet potato wedges from the roasting pan and call
       them ‘chips’.

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHRISTMAS, LAMB, NUTS/SEEDS & GRAINS, SIDES & SALADS | Tagged
   dukkah recipe, Gifts in jars, Half cup popcorn kernels yields,
   home-made dukkah, how to use dukkah, Lahm bi ajine, lamb pizza,
   pistachio dukkah, Teacher gifts | 25 Replies

2014 Food-related Christmas gift guide. Handmade in Melbourne!

   Posted on November 5, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   29

   May I just say, in caps, that CHRISTMAS IS LOOMING. Don’t panic! Here’s
   my annual food-related Christmas Gift Guide. Everything below is made
   with love in my home town, Melbourne. Buying handmade creates a
   domino-effect of happiness – for you, the gift recipient and the maker.
   Let’s ignore the sea of mass-produced crap trotted out every year by
   those greedy multinationals and support our local artisans!
   Overseas readers – you can buy locally by checking out these fab foodie
   creations: jikits mini ice cream mobile (USA), misako mimoko’s apple
   wall hanger (Spain), Fine Little Day’s tomato poster (Sweden); or make
   your own 70s Supermarket Play Set with Alice Apple’s DIY fabric panel
   (UK).
   OK, here we go…
   1. Able and Game Butter tea towel. $19.70. Able and Game’s super cute
   hand-drawn designs feature on cards, totes, tea towels and calendars.
   Available on etsy, and at these worldwide stockists.
   2. Hamb ‘Fish barbecue’ mens tee. $69. Hamb’s quirky limited edition
   tees, library bags and plywood clocks are hand-illustrated and
   screen-printed in Melbourne. Available online here, and at these
   stockists.
   3. Sandra Eterovic ‘Italian ingredients’ original painting on paper.
   $85. Sandra’s beautiful work is hand-made with care, using the best
   quality sustainable materials. Available on etsy, along with fabulous
   cards, OOAK dolls, cushions, mirrors, prints, scarves and wooden art!
   Sandra was recently profiled on The Design Files and Handmade Life.
   4. Re-sew-cool Watermelon brooch kit. $15. Kit contains pattern,
   instructions, sewing needle, ric-rac, recycled felt, recycled buttons,
   natural yarn and brooch clasp. Available here and at these stockists,
   along with 5 more fab brooch varieties, and other kits. Handmade in
   Melbourne by the talented Sister Outlaws.
   5. Made by Mosey banana cushion. $66. Made by Mosey’s colourful range
   of cushions, garlands, soft mobiles and quilts are created by Madeleine
   Sargent. Available here and also at Craft Vic.
   6. Rooftop Honey Test Tube Gift Set. $19.95. This calico gift bag from
   CBD beekeepers Rooftop Honey includes a bee-friendly seed pack, recipe
   postcard and set of three honey samples (harvested from Melbourne
   rooftops) in glass test tubes, hand wax dipped and labelled with
   origin. Available here.
   7. Neryl ‘Pineapple Mary’ limited edition archival ink giclee print.
   Medium: $95, Large: $160. Music-lovin’ juice swiggin’ Mary would jazz
   up any kitchen, dining room or den! She’s available here, along with
   her lady friends. Created by clever chick Neryl Walker.
   8. Takeawei Origami serving board. Large $105, small $85. Handmade by
   Chela Edmunds in North Melbourne, this platter features a satin glaze
   star pattern and is dishwasher/microwave safe. Perfect for antipasto,
   sushi or cheese! These have sold out in the Takeawei store, but are
   available online at Liberty Trading Company. Be quick before they
   vamoose!
   9. KaPow Kids Harem-style kids ice cream shorties. $32.95. Matching
   headband also available! KaPow Kids threads are hand-made in limited
   quantities and sell out fast, so run! Available online here, and at
   these stockists.
   10. Evie Barrow Miss Pudding. $11.20. Available on etsy. Evie makes
   playfully-illustrated creations and one-of-a-kind textile characters,
   including the delightful Miss Pudding. The perfect Christmas ornament,
   Miss Pudding is made from cotton and felt with hand-embroidered
   features and a cotton hanging loop. She also comes wrapped in special
   Christmas paper, designed by Evie!
   11. Lucy Folk Sugar Cube Clutch (Musk Stick). $295. The ultimate lolly
   bag! Melbourne’s queen of wearable food has just released her sweetest
   collection yet, celebrating sugar! Available online here, at these
   world-wide stockists and at Lucy’s flagship shop at 1A Crossley St,
   Melbourne.
   12. Bridget Bodenham Pestle and mortar. $200. Bridget lives and works
   in her studio in beautiful Hepburn Springs, an hour out of Melbourne.
   Her work is organic, textured and just lovely. Available at Mr Kitly
   and these stockists.
   Footnote: This is not a sponsored list. These are all items I genuinely
   love.
   Before ordering, be sure to check with the sellers that delivery is
   possible before Christmas! Etsy shop prices are in USD.
   © Please note photos are the property of their respective owners.

   2014 food-related Gift Guide. Handmade in Melbourne.
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CHRISTMAS, CRAFT, DESIGN & ILLUSTRATION, OUT & ABOUT IN
   MELBOURNE | Tagged 2014 Christmas gift guide, Christmas gift guide,
   Christmas gift ideas, Christmas gift ideas Australia, food related
   gifts, foodie gifts Australia | 29 Replies

A cracking good meal

   Posted on October 27, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   37

   I’ve been MIA from the blog yet again, this time due to serious (and
   scary) illness. I know reading about people’s ailments is about as
   interesting as tax law, but I hope you’ll indulge me sharing this as it
   took me completely by surprise!
   I contracted sepsis and ended up in hospital for nearly 2 weeks,
   including 6 days in intensive care. I’d never even heard of sepsis
   before and consulted Doctor Google from my hospital bed – quite unwise
   as it freaked the living daylights out of me. I had all kinds of tests
   and horrible procedures, including a catheter in my neck. Fun! Short
   story is, I survived!
   So, I’ve been taking life at a snail’s pace ever since, starting with a
   little holiday in Cobden – look at those views! I’m going to run a One
   Equals Two Light for the next few posts; starting with two quick and
   easy egg recipes which I’m sure you’ll wanna ‘have a crack’ at 🙂
   BAKED EGGS, 2 WAYS:
   [Recipe 1] with CANNELLINI BEANS and ROASTED CAPSICUM
   [Recipe 2] with NAVY BEANS, SPINACH and GOAT’S CHEESE
   Got beans? Got eggs? Got pasta sauce? That’s dinner sorted!
   Baked eggs are a favourite midweek meal around here, as they’re on the
   table in 15 minutes. They’re also great for weekend brekkies and
   lunches.
   Nearly every culture has their take on baked eggs – Shakshouka, Huevos
   rancheros, Les œufs en cocotte… have I forgotten any?? Mine are usually
   served up Italian-style as I often have a tub of home-made Amatriciana
   pasta sauce in the freezer (which incidentally is a splendid topping
   for chicken parma).
   The extras are limited only by your imagination – replace the white
   beans, rosemary and pancetta with black beans, smoked paprika and
   chorizo; toss in some pan-fried zucchini strips and drizzle with pesto;
   or swap the beans for chickpeas and stir through a handful of roasted
   eggplant chunks.
   Are you a baked egg fancier? If so, do share your favourite combo
   (links are welcome)!

   Cobden Ingredients for baked eggs Baked eggs and beans. One Equals Two
   Baked eggs, beans and peppers. One Equals Two [Recipe 1] Baked eggs
   with cannellini beans and roasted capsicum (pictured)

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   ♦ 2½ cups (600–650g/1.3–1.4 lb) reserved Amatriciana sauce
   1 x 400g (15 oz) can cannellini (white kidney) beans, drained, rinsed
   2 teaspoons finely chopped fresh rosemary
   ½–1 cup marinated roasted capsicum, drained (optional for kids)
   4 eggs
   Sea salt and freshly-cracked pepper
   Fresh chopped parsley to serve
   Crusty bread, to serve

   Preheat oven to 200°C (390ºF).
   Place reserved Amatriciana sauce, beans and rosemary into a small
   saucepan and simmer gently, stirring, for 5 minutes.
   Divide warmed mixture amongst 4 x 1½-cup capacity (or 2 x 3-cup
   capacity) oven-proof ramekins. Arrange drained capsicum on top.
   Make an indent in the centre of each with the back of a spoon, and
   crack in an egg (or two if you’re using large ramekins).
   Bake until eggs have set to your liking; 10 minutes for soft and 15
   minutes for firm.
   Season, scatter with parsley and serve with crusty bread for dunking.

   [Recipe 2] Baked eggs with navy beans, spinach and goat’s cheese

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   ♦ 2½ cups (600–650g/1.3–1.4 lb) reserved Amatriciana sauce
   ⅛ teaspoon chilli powder (or more, to taste)
   1 x 400g (15 oz) can navy (pearl haricot) beans, drained and rinsed
   50g (1¾ oz) baby spinach, roughly chopped
   4 eggs
   30–60g (1–2 oz) goat’s cheese, crumbled (optional for kids, see notes)
   Fresh basil, torn, to serve
   Crusty bread, to serve

   Preheat oven to 200°C (390ºF).
   Place reserved Amatriciana sauce, chilli and navy beans into a small
   saucepan and simmer gently, stirring, for 3 minutes.
   Divide warmed mixture amongst 4 x 1½-cup capacity (or 2 x 3-cup
   capacity) oven-proof ramekins. Arrange spinach on top, pushing down
   lightly with a spoon.
   Make an indent in the centre of each with the back of a spoon, and
   crack in an egg (or two if you’re using large ramekins).
   Bake until eggs have set to your liking; 10 minutes for soft and 15
   minutes for firm.
   Season. Scatter with crumbled goat’s cheese and basil, and serve with
   crusty bread for scooping.
     * Kid tip: Kids may prefer their baked eggs plain, in which case you
       can replace the goat’s cheese with grated parmesan cheese.
     * Feel free to add a good slosh of chilli sauce or tabasco!
     * Home-made amatriciana sauce can of course be replaced with
       store-bought tomato pasta sauce (Maggie’s and Spiral Foods are both
       rich and lovely). Add pan-fried bacon, pancetta or chorizo if
       desired.
     * Navy (pearl haricot) beans are small and white; and are commonly
       used in baked beans. They’re popular in the UK and USA, and kids
       love them! In Australia they’re available canned from Health food
       stores.

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in BEANS | Tagged baked eggs, baked eggs tomato, baked eggs with
   beans, navy beans Australia, what are navy beans | 37 Replies

Blades of glory

   Posted on August 26, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   30

   [Recipe 1] BLADE BEEF POT ROAST with SHIITAKE MUSHROOM GRAVY and
   BRUSSELS SPROUTS WITH TOASTED WALNUTS transforms into
   [Recipe 2] ASIAN-STYLE TACOS with BLADE BEEF, KIMCHI COLESLAW and
   SRIRACHA MAYO
   There were moans at the dinner table. Not whiney ones, I mean the
   ‘Can’t talk, eating’ pleasure-induced type. I’ve gotta say these are
   two of the tastiest meals I’ve served in ages!
   The inspiration for this post began with a dish the husband and I
   devoured recently at one of our favourite locals, The More the Better –
   perfectly unctuous pork belly strips, rolled up in large gossamer-thin
   slices of vinegary pickled daikon (Chinese white radish). The stand-out
   component for me though was the kimchi-style coleslaw dotted on top.
   Traditional Korean kimchi is made from fermented cabbage and other
   veggies, but The More the Better served theirs raw, so it retained a
   satisfying crunch. Man it was good.
   I immediately set about creating my own version of kimchi slaw. We are
   a family of slaw hooverers, often eating it once a week in wraps with
   fish or lamb. Mine is usually a mostly-mayo concoction with a dash of
   apple cider vinegar, but elevating the vinegar to hero status is a
   taste sensation. Instead of mandolining a daikon to use for wrapping
   (too fiddly), I grated it and added it to the slaw for an extra kick of
   tartness. YUM!
   Although we do love our pork belly, I served the kimchi slaw with
   strips of tender roast blade beef, rolled up like soft tacos in Chinese
   pancakes, with a squirt of creamy sriracha mayo to balance out the
   vinegared slaw.
   As this blog is all about creating two meals from one, we enjoyed my
   slightly Asian-style blade beef pot roast on the first night, reserving
   a couple of cups of the juicy beef for the Chinese pancakes. This pot
   roast is the perfect Winter pig-out, drizzled with shiitake mushroom
   gravy (which just happens to be gluten-free) and served with
   confit-style baked spuds and super-tasty Brussels sprouts scattered
   with toasted walnuts for texture.
   Two meals from one, too easy, and either meal would be perfect to dish
   up for Fathers Day next weekend. xx

   Brussels sprouts with toasted walnuts. One Equals Two. Blade beef pot
   roast with shiitake mushroom gravy. One Equals Two. [Recipe 1] Blade
   beef pot roast with shiitake mushroom gravy and Brussels sprouts with
   toasted walnuts

   Ingredients (beef serves 4 for two meals):
   2 tablespoons olive oil
   1.75 kilo (3.8 lb) blade (bolar) beef
   2 cups good-quality beef stock
   2 tablespoons soy sauce
   1 teaspoon Chinese five spice powder
   2 small brown onions, peeled and sliced
   4 garlic cloves, peeled and thinly sliced
   4 large potatoes, cut into wedges
   Brussels sprouts with toasted walnuts to serve
   For the shiitake mushroom gravy:
   40g (1½ oz) dried shiitake mushrooms, soaked for 30 minutes in 2 cups
   boiling water, drained (¼ cup soaking liquid reserved)
   Salt and freshly-cracked black pepper

   Preheat oven to 150°C (300ºF).
   Heat olive oil in a heavy-based frying pan. Add the beef and cook over
   medium–high heat, turning occasionally, until well-browned all over,
   for about 8 minutes. Transfer to a small, close-fitting, lidded
   ovenproof pot, preferably cast iron.
   Mix stock, soy sauce and Chinese five spice powder together and pour
   into the frying pan. Simmer gently for 2 minutes, scraping up all the
   brown bits from the bottom. Pour over the beef. Scatter the onion and
   garlic slices around the beef.
   Place into the pre-heated oven and roast, tightly covered, for 1½ hours
   at which point the beef should be turned and ladled with pan juices.
   Remove 1½ cups of the pan juices and pour into a small baking dish (I
   use a loaf-sized cake pan). Add the potato wedges, toss, cover tightly
   with foil, and place in the oven next to the beef. The potato pieces
   will deliciously poach confit-style in the beef juices for crisping
   later!
   Bake beef and potatoes for a further 1½ hours, turning the potatoes
   once, after 45 minutes.
   Total beef cooking time is 3 hours. Test to see whether beef is fork
   tender – if not, return to the oven for a further 30 minutes and check
   again.
   Take the beef from the pan, place onto a board and rest, covered with
   foil, for 20 minutes.
   Remove the potato chunks from the pan with tongs or a slotted spoon,
   and transfer to a tray lined with baking paper. Turn the oven up to
   250°C (480ºF), and return potatoes to the oven for 25–30 minutes for
   crisping, while you prepare the gravy and slice the beef. Potatoes can
   be kept warm in a low oven.
   For the gravy: ladle 1½ cups of the beef cooking juices from the pan,
   skim off the fat and pour into a small saucepan. Add a few tablespoons
   of the roasted onion and garlic slices, the soaked shiitake mushrooms
   and the reserved ¼ cup mushroom soaking liquid. Simmer for 5 minutes,
   until reduced. Season to taste. Puree in a blender until very smooth.
   Add a splash more stock or pan juices if it is too thick. Transfer to a
   small small warmed jug.
   When ready to serve, slice the beef.
   ♦ Reserve half the sliced beef (approx. 2 cups/450g/1 lb), and ¼ cup of
   the cooking juices, for the Asian-style tacos (see recipe 2).
   Drizzle the remaining sliced beef with pan juices. Serve with the
   roasted spuds, shiitake mushroom gravy and Brussels sprouts with
   toasted walnuts.
     * A pot roast must be cooked in a tightly-sealed pot! Like brisket,
       blade beef is best suited to wet roasting. Blade is a cheap cut and
       if not cooked properly can be as tough as an old boot! The key to
       beautiful, meltingly tender meat is lots of moisture and a long
       cooking time on a low heat. The beef should be fairly snug, with
       liquid at least half-way up the meat. I use a 4 litre (8½ pint)
       capacity cast iron lidded casserole pot. If yours is bigger, add a
       splash more stock.
     * Reserved roasted beef blade can be stored in the fridge,
       well-covered, for up to 3 days.
     * Leftover shiitake mushroom gravy can be refrigerated for up to 3
       days; or frozen for up to 3 months. Defrost overnight in the
       fridge. Warm, stirring, in a small saucepan. It’s delicious
       drizzled over steak!
     * Kid tip: Children may prefer plain steamed veggies with their
       roast, in which case adults can enjoy the leftover Brussels sprouts
       with toasted walnuts tomorrow, warmed in a lightly-oiled pan.
     * Dried shiitake mushrooms are available from Asian grocers and large
       supermarkets. If unavailable you can easily whip up traditional
       gravy instead. Ladle 2 cups of the cooking juices from the roasting
       pan into a small saucepan. Add a few tablespoons of the roasted
       onion and garlic slices and 2 tablespoons plain (all purpose)
       flour. Simmer gently for 10–15 minutes, stirring, until reduced and
       thickened. Season with salt and pepper. Puree in a blender until
       very smooth, and transfer to a small small warmed jug.

   Kimchi coleslaw with daikon. One Equals Two. Blade beef, kimchi slaw
   and sriracha mayo Asian-style tacos. One Equals Two.

   [Recipe 2] Asian-style tacos with blade beef, kimchi coleslaw and
   sriracha mayo

   Ingredients (serves 4):
   10 jian bing (Chinese pancakes)
   ♦ 2 cups (450g/1 lb) reserved roasted blade beef (+ ¼ cup pan juices),
   shredded, warmed
   Sriracha mayo, to serve
   Kimchi coleslaw (can make 1 day ahead):
   ½ wombok (Chinese/Napa cabbage), finely shredded (about 4 cups)
   1 large carrot, grated (about 1 cup)
   1 medium daikon (Chinese white radish), grated (about 1½ cups)
   2 whole spring onions (scallions), thinly sliced
   2 teaspoons sugar
   1 teaspoon Gochugaru (Korean red chilli pepper flakes), or more (to
   taste)
   ⅓ cup (80ml) Japanese rice wine vinegar
   1 tablespoon apple cider vinegar
   ½ teaspoon sea salt
   Black sesame seeds, for sprinkling

   Place wombok, carrot, daikon and spring onions in a large salad bowl.
   Mix sugar, gochugaru, vinegars and salt together and drizzle over. Toss
   well and scatter with black sesame seeds. Refrigerate until required.
   Warm Chinese pancakes until just starting to bubble, in a lightly-oiled
   frying pan. Don’t overcook them, 1–2 minutes each side will
   suffice. Wrap in foil to keep warm.
   To serve, spoon warmed reserved roasted blade beef and kimchi coleslaw
   onto each Chinese pancake. Drizzle with sriracha mayo and roll up to
   enclose. Enjoy!
     * Jian bing (very thin wheat-based Chinese pancakes) are
       available refrigerated in packets at Asian grocers, and are
       commonly used to wrap Peking duck. They’re usually prepared by
       lightly warming in a microwave, but I like gently frying them as
       the edges crisp nicely. Replace with small tortillas
       if unavailable.
     * Gochugaru (Korean red chilli pepper flakes) is available from Asian
       food stores. It is different to traditional chilli flakes, with
       more of a capsicum-ish flavour. Black sesame seeds and Japanese
       rice wine vinegar are available from large supermarkets and Asian
       food stores.
     * You’ll need sriracha chili sauce for the sriracha mayo, which is
       available at Asian food stores and select supermarkets. Although
       commercially available at Woolworths, the authentic (and far
       superior!) version, made by Huy Fong Foods in California, is
       available in Australia from USA Foods.
     * Reserved shredded beef can be gently warmed in the microwave,
       covered with cling film. Drizzle with the reserved pan juices,
       cover with cling film (or a lid), and microwave on high for 1–2
       minutes. Don’t make it too hot!
     * Kid tip: My 10-year old gobbles up these pancakes as is, but my 7
       year old prefers tomato sauce (ketchup), grated carrot and sliced
       avocado in his.

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in BEEF, FATHERS DAY, OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE, SIDES & SALADS |
   Tagged beef blade pot roast, leftover roast beef, pot roast cooking
   time, roast blade beef, shiitake mushroom gravy, sriracha Australia |
   30 Replies

Taking stock [number 1]

   Posted on July 28, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   39

   Here’s a little snapshot of what I’ve been making, baking, admiring and
   thinking about lately. Love this concept by Pip at Meet me at Mikes.
   Pip shared her most recent #takingstock here, and there’s a blank list
   at the bottom of the post for you to copy on your own blog or Facebook,
   if you feel inspired. Oh, and if you participate, leave a link in the
   comments so we can read yours too!

   Barry Gibb doll. Saskia Ericson. Abominable snowman cake. One Equals
   Two Hello possum Pickled turnips Evie Barrow pack! Making: a Barry Gibb
   doll for my 7-year old Bee Gees fan. I used this Woman’s Day rag doll
   pattern for the upper body, winged it for the beard, pants and boots,
   and followed a fab hair tutorial on this Lincraft how-to card (thanks
   Michelle).
   Cooking: an Abominable Snowman cake for my 7-year old’s
   birthday, loosely based on the yeti from Komaneko the Curious cat.
   Drinking: hot chocolate with fluffy milk – did you know you can make
   creamy, frothy milk in a coffee plunger (French press)?
   Reading: Anorak.
   Wanting: more time in a day. Even 25 hours would be good. Thanks.
   Looking: at Pinterest before the rest of my family wakes up. A
   daily ritual!
   Playing: Pictionary.
   Deciding: which Country Show to visit this year – Birregurra or Cobden.
   Wishing: the sun would come out.
   Enjoying: my girlfriends company. Lady friends rock.
   Waiting: for Spring.
   Liking: Maruyama Asami‘s embroideries of people eating, especially this
   one.
   Wondering: why there’s a big possum on our fence at 6.30am. He should
   be asleep.
   Loving: my boys, all three of them.
   Pondering: how to balance life and social media. I shared my tips over
   at Kidspot, along with some other ace bloggers.
   Considering: having a Garage Sale.
   Watching: Jarvis Cocker’s 1998 doco series on outsider art
   environments. So good!
   Hoping: to have dinner at The Moor’s Head again. Soon.
   Marveling: at my 10-year old’s cactus and succulent collection.
   Needing: a proper holiday.
   Smelling: sweet, vinegary pickled turnips! Here’s Michelle’s fab
   recipe. Mine turned out bright magenta (see photo) as I doubled the
   beetroot!
   Wearing: blue things and these hand-made shoes – so comfy, they’re like
   slippers.
   Following: Shit brick fences of Melbourne.
   Noticing: grey hairs! Yikes!
   Thinking: about Christmas presents. Only 5 months to go!
   Feeling: mostly happy, but sometimes sad. Missing my dad.
   Admiring: my clever husband’s portrait drawings.
   Sorting: fabric pieces from Amitie.
   Buying: lovely hand-made goodies from Evie Barrow. Look at the
   beautiful packaging! I almost didn’t want to unwrap it.
   Getting: into a jam-making frenzy! Help!
   Bookmarking: this soup recipe by Simple Provisions, after reading this
   post about the nutritional powerhouse that is watercress.
   Disliking: Tony Abbott (Australia’s Prime Minister).
   Opening: old letters from my lovely Oma in Holland (she died recently,
   aged 105).
   Giggling: at my son’s texta vandalism of my husband’s rejected life
   drawings; especially the elderly nude man, now wearing a mankini and
   boater hat.
   Snacking: on Pana chocolate.
   Coveting: one of Kirsten Perry‘s planters.
   Helping: my 10-year old as he makes our pancakes.
   Hearing: my playlist of favourite Australian tracks by Dick Diver,
   Go-Betweens, Architecture in Helsinki and Eddy Current.
     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in CRAFT, OUT & ABOUT IN MELBOURNE | Tagged #takingstock, Barry
   Gibb doll, Bee Gees doll, monster cake, Yeti cake | 39 Replies

Jam session

   Posted on June 24, 2014 by Saskia (1=2)
   47

   [Recipe 1] FEIJOA, QUINCE and ROSEWATER JAM transforms into
   [Recipe 2] SPICED LINZER TORTE
   I’ve been on a jam-making frenzy! “It smells like the doughnut van at
   the footy” said the husband, and I could only take that as a huge
   compliment.
   Feijoa, quince and rosewater jam is one of my favourite conserve
   creations to date. I adore feijoas! If you’re unfamiliar with them,
   they’re a little like a musky guava in taste, with a dash of watermelon
   and kiwi. They have a short season and are tricky to find, so when my
   friend Janet dropped off a bag recently I was one happy lady!
   I usually stew feijoas with apples, but decided to give feijoa jam a
   try. Honestly it was as if the stars had aligned as within two days of
   my jam-making decision I discovered the important reference tool
   ‘Making men happy with jams and jellies’, published in 1930 and part of
   the beautiful Little Blue Book series. I also scored lemons from my mum
   and even styling props in the form of pink paper doilies (from my
   delightful 7-year old niece ‘especially for your blog’) and pink roses
   from my neighbours.
   I love a robust, zesty jam and was concerned feijoas might be a
   little delicate in flavour and colour on their own, so decided to
   chuck in some quinces. Quinces have a similar season to feijoas, and
   they’re natural partners; both being quite fragrant – almost perfumey –
   and somewhat exotic. Quinces turn a beautiful ruby red colour after
   cooking too, which is a fab bonus!
   I was so chuffed with how the jam turned out! After giving most of it
   away as gifts, I made a second batch the following week, reserving some
   for a pretty damn amazing Middle Eastern style Spiced Linzer Torte
   we’ve served up to two groups of dinner guests recently. I heavily
   tweaked the Hairy Bikers recipe, using more flour as I found their
   mixture a little wet. I also doubled the jam, added lemon zest and
   cloves (traditional Linzer Torte ingredients); and swapped the cinnamon
   for cardamom, which pairs beautifully with quinces and feijoas. Lastly,
   I lined the top edge with flaked almonds, both to hide the scrappy
   pastry joins and add a bit of crunch. Absolutely bloody delicious, even
   if I do say so myself!
   I’m signing off with a poem by Dougall from Episode 19 of the Magic
   Roundabout:
   “Life is for living.
   Jam is for giving.
   Love should be spread.
   And I’m off to bed.”

   Feijoas and quinces Feijoa and quince jam. One Equals Two [Recipe
   1] Feijoa, quince and rosewater jam

   Ingredients (makes 1.8 kilos/about 4 lb jam):
   5 firm quinces (about 1.2–1.3 kilos/2½–2¾ lb)
   ½ cup (125ml) lemon juice (from 2 medium lemons)
   10 cups (2.5 litres) water
   1 tablespoon lemon zest (from 2 medium lemons)
   4 cups (800g/1¾ lb) sugar
   8 feijoa (about 500g/1 lb), peeled and chopped
   2 small firm pears (about 300g/10½ oz), peeled, cored and chopped into
   small cubes
   1 teaspoon rose water

   Rinse and scrub the quinces. Place into a large heavy-bottomed saucepan
   with the lemon juice and water. Boil, covered, for 25 minutes. Remove
   from the heat and leave the quinces in the syrupy liquid for at least 6
   hours, or overnight.
   Remove quinces with a slotted spoon and place on a board, reserving the
   liquid. Add lemon zest and sugar to the liquid and bring to the boil.
   Turn down heat and simmer for 1–2 minutes, stirring, until sugar has
   dissolved. Remove from the heat.
   Peel off the quince skins. Core quinces and chop roughly. Place into
   the prepared liquid as you go, to prevent discolouring. Add the feijoa
   and pear.
   Bring to the boil, turn down heat and simmer rapidly, for 1½–2 hours,
   uncovered, until thick. Stir occasionally, and enjoy watching it turn
   ruby red right before your eyes! Keep a close eye on the jam towards
   the end of the cooking process, to ensure it doesn’t stick and burn.
   Give the jam 3 whizzes with a stick blender.
   Add rose water and simmer for a further two minutes. Remove jam from
   the heat.
   Test to check the jam is ready. Place a small ceramic plate in the
   freezer for 5 minutes. Spoon a heaped teaspoon of jam onto the plate
   and return to the freezer for two minutes. If the jam sets and forms a
   skin it is ready! If the jam is runny and can be poured off the plate,
   return the saucepan to the stovetop and simmer jam for a further ten
   minutes, stirring constantly. Test again.
   Divide the jam amongst hot, sterilised jars.
   ♦ Reserve 500g (1 lb) jam for the Spiced Linzer Torte.
   Store remaining jam in a cool, dark place.
     * Use good quality fruit that is firm and not over-ripe. Fully
       ripened fruit contains less pectin, the substance that makes jams
       set. It’s best to use your fruit as soon as possible after buying
       or picking.
     * I always add a couple of pears to my jams as they’re high in
       pectin. This will help achieve a good set even if your hero fruit
       is beginning to over-ripen.
     * Rose water can be found at Middle Eastern grocery stores. If you
       have roses in your garden, you can make your own! Rose water is
       beautiful sprinkled on khoshaf (Middle Eastern dried fruit salad).
     * Resist the desperate urge to enjoy your jam immediately! Allow it
       to further firm up for at least 24 hours, preferably longer, before
       using.
     * Jam in properly sterilised jars will keep in a cool, dark place for
       up to ten months. Refrigerate after opening.

   Making men happy with jams and jellies Feijoa, quince and rosewater
   jam. One Equals Two Spiced Linzer Torte with quince jam. One Equals Two

   [Recipe 2] Spiced Linzer torte

   Ingredients (serves 6–8):
   175g (6 oz) almond meal
   175g (6 oz) caster (superfine) sugar
   ½ teaspoon ground cardamom
   ¼ teaspoon ground cloves
   200g (1⅓ cups) plain (all-purpose) flour
   2 teaspoons lemon zest, chopped (from 1 lemon)
   ⅛ teaspoon sea salt
   175g (6 oz/1½ sticks) cold unsalted butter, cut into small cubes
   1 egg, lightly beaten
   ♦ 500g (1 lb) reserved Feijoa, quince and rosewater jam (see recipe 1)
   Egg wash (1 egg yolk, whisked with 1 teaspoon milk)
   50g (1.7 oz) flaked almonds
   Icing sugar, for dusting

   Process almond meal, sugar, cardamom, cloves, flour, lemon zest and
   salt until combined. Add the cubes of butter and process until mixture
   resembles coarse breadcrumbs. Add egg and process until dough just
   comes together.
   Transfer to a bowl (it will look quite crumbly, don’t worry). Knead
   lightly into a ball. Wrap in cling film and refrigerate for 1 hour.
   Grease a 3cm (1″) deep, 25cm (10″) fluted tart tin, with removable
   base.
   With a sharp knife, cut off one third of the dough (about 260g/9 oz)
   and roll out between two pieces of baking paper to make a rectangle
   approx. 25cm x 18cm (10″ x 7″) , and 3mm (.1″) thick. This is for the
   top layer of pastry strips. Slide onto a tray and pop in the fridge.
   Roll the larger piece of dough between two pieces of baking paper into
   a piece large enough to line the base and sides of the pan, about 5mm
   (.2″) thick. Carefully press the dough onto the base and up the sides
   of the prepared pan, trimming off the excess. Refrigerate for at least
   30 minutes, covered in cling film.
   Preheat oven to 180°C (350ºF).
   Blind bake the pastry: cover pastry base and sides with baking paper.
   Cut two 6cm/2½” high strips of foil and fold over the sides of the
   tin to prevent the top edge of the pastry from burning. Fill lined tart
   case with pastry weights (or uncooked rice) and bake for 15 minutes.
   Carefully remove paper, foil and weights. Bake for a further 10
   minutes. Remove from oven and allow to cool slightly.
   ♦ Spread cooled pastry base evenly with reserved Feijoa, quince and
   rosewater jam.
   Remove smaller piece of dough from fridge and, using a sharp knife or
   pastry wheel, cut into 1½cm (.6″) wide strips. Carefully place strips
   diagonally over jam to form a criss-cross pattern. Press the edges to
   seal, and trim off excess.
   Very lightly brush pastry strips and outer top edge of pastry with egg
   wash. Arrange flaked almonds around the edge of the torte, brushing
   with egg wash here and there. Use an outward movement to prevent the
   nuts sticking to the brush – ‘wipe’ the brush as if you’re removing
   paint!
   Bake torte for 25–30 minutes, until pastry is pale golden brown. Allow
   to cool in the pan, then carefully remove and slide onto a serving
   plate.
   Dust Linzer torte lightly with icing sugar, cut into wedges and serve.
   [Recipe loosely adapted from the Hairy Bikers]
     * If using a different jam for the Linzer Torte, such as the more
       traditional plum or raspberry, you may prefer to replace the
       cardamom with cinnamon.
     * Any type of jam can be used for a Linzer Torte! For more jammy
       inspiration, check out Sawsan’s Watermelon rind jam, John’s Damson
       plum and cardamom jam, Laura’s Whisky, carrot and ginger marmalade,
       Sofia’s Strawberry, banana and chia seed jam and Brydie’s Lime and
       orange marmalade. Be sure to read Brydie’s excellent jam-making Q
       and A too.
     * Linzer Torte can be made the day before, and stored in a covered
       container for up to 24 hours.
     * For longer storage, Linzer Torte will keep beautifully in the
       fridge, covered, for at least 3 days. Individual slices can also be
       successfully frozen. Defrost overnight in the fridge.

     * Print
     *
     * [pinit_fg_en_rect_gray_20.png]
     * Tweet
     * Pocket
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...

   Posted in BISCUITS/COOKIES & SLICES, FRUIT, PASTRY & BREAD,
   SWEETS/DESSERTS & CAKES, TARTS & QUICHES | Tagged feijoa fruit, feijoa
   jam, feijoa recipes, linzer tart, linzer torte, linzer torte austrian
   recipe, quince jam, quince recipes | 47 Replies

Post navigation

   ← Older posts

   1=2 presents creative ways to get more out of your cooking. Prepare 1
   night's dinner, along with planned leftovers (planned-overs); to be
   used to create a different second meal in a flash!

   Add your email and click 'sign me up' to be notified of new posts.

   Join 1,864 other followers

   ____________________

   (BUTTON) Sign me up!

FOOD BLOGS & WEBSITES I LIKE:

     * Chef in disguise
     * Chocolate and zucchini
     * City hippy farmgirl
     * Cook clean make marry
     * Dinner Rad
     * Food is my friend
     * Food Safety Fact sheets
     * Foodwise
     * From the Bartolini kitchens
     * Good fish bad fish
     * How to freeze food (part 1)
     * How to freeze food (part 2)
     * Hungry girl por vida
     * Kitchen fire safety
     * Lunchlady
     * Martha Stewart
     * Simple Provisions
     * Snacks quarterly
     * The sugar hit
     * Thug Kitchen
     * Vegan kitchen of Dr Caligari
     * Whole Larder Love

OTHER BLOGS & WEBSITES I LIKE:

     * Anorak magazine
     * Beci Orpin
     * Collection a day
     * Creature comforts
     * Dawn raiders
     * Evie Barrow
     * Fine little day
     * Form & reform
     * Frankie & Swiss
     * Grain edit
     * Handmade Charlotte
     * Handmade life
     * Hello sandwich
     * Jikits
     * Kickcan and conkers
     * Lili Scratchy
     * Loobylu
     * Meet me at Mikes
     * Messy nessy chic
     * Misako Mimoko
     * Neryl
     * Pikaland
     * Poppytalk
     * Repugnant charm
     * Sandra Eterovic
     * Sister outlaws
     * The art room plant
     * The design files
     * The jealous curator
     * Vintage childrens books
     * Wuppenif

Recipe & article categories

   Recipe & article categories[Select Category___________]

Archives

   Archives [Select Month__]

Copyright info

   © One Equals Two 2015. All rights reserved. All recipes, illustrations
   and photos (unless otherwise noted) are created by me. Please don’t
   pilfer my stuff! Excerpts may of course be re-blogged or pinned,
   provided that full credit is given to One Equals Two with a specific
   link to the original content. Cheers.
   Blog at WordPress.com.


   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   ____________________________________________________________
   Post to
   Cancel Reblog Post

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
